Privacy Policy
This is the privacy policy for the mobile app
CardGames.io
("The App"), published by the Icelandic company
Rauðás Games ehf.
("The company").
Your data, and how we use it
The app does not have access to any personal data from you. We store data on your device to remember your scores and preferences
            for the games in the app, we do not send this data to our servers, it's only stored on your device.
We send events to our servers to get aggregated statistics for gameplay, i.e. we may log how many games of Hearts are played by users
            of the app, how many percentage of games the computer players win, how many games are started and finished etc. This data is only saved in an aggregated form,
            we know that all our users together played 5000 games of Hearts today for example, but we have no way of knowing how many games a specific user played.
We don't have access to your name, email address or any other data about you. If you email us for support (
support@cardgames.io
) then we'll
            have your email address but will only ever use it to reply to your emails, we never use it for any other purpose and never share it with any 3rd parties.
Your data and how it is used by our Analytic partners
In addition to aggregate data collected by us as described above, this app utilizes Google Analytics for additional insights in how our users use our app and 
            how we can improve it. This data is collected in aggregate and stored on Google servers. We use Google analytics to measure 
            how many people visit us, how many people play each of our games, how many people visit from each country,
            and other more broken-down diagnosic data than what we collect on our own servers.
Google may utilize personal information in forming the aggregate data, but by the time we get access to the data all personally identifiable 
            information has been stripped away: much like with data we collect we are able to use Google Analytics to see that 4000 people using Chrome 
            visited our site and that on average they spent 20 minutes playing games, but we cannot trace that back to any specific user - all 
            data we are interested in is collected in aggregate and we configure Google Analytics to store as little data about our users as possible.
We prompt our users about our anaytic collection in relevant regions the first time the app is opened. You
            can also later change your mind by clicking on the menu icon in the upper left corner and choosing Ads & Privacy.
Your data and how it's used by our advertising partners
To serve ads within the game we use Google AdMob, an advertising network owned by Google. They use a "device identifer" on your device to serve you personalized ads. A device identifier is
            a unique number that they have access to, which they can use to serve you personalized ads, based on apps or websites you've visited. AdMob may also send requests to 10 other ad
            companies which can then use your device identifier to serve you relevant ads.
For users in the EU and EEA, you will get a prompt when starting the app for the first time, asking whether you want to allow personalized ads, or get non-personalized ones. You
            can also later change your mind by clicking on the menu icon in the upper left corner and choosing Ads & Privacy.
Other ad companies
Below is a list of the ad companies we work with and links to their privacy policies, if you want to better understand how they may use your data.
Google
Privacy policy
Criteo
Privacy policy
Adobe Advertising Cloud
Privacy policy
Amazon
Privacy policy
AppLovin Corp.
Privacy policy
AppNexus
Privacy policy
Dentsu Aegis Network
Privacy policy
eBay
Privacy policy
Facebook
Privacy policy
Interpublic Group
Privacy policy
Contact
If you have any questions or comments regarding this privacy policy you can always contact us by email at
support@cardgames.io
.
Sub-section Policy: 
Sub-policy 0
https://www.google.com/policies/technologies/partner-sites/:

Sub-policy 1
https://www.criteo.com/privacy/:
What does 2025 have in store for retail media? Check out the new “10 Trends” report.
Download the report
Platform
Back
Back
Platform
Advertising & monetization for marketers and media owners
Commerce Media Platform
The connected commerce media environment for the open internet
Commerce Growth
For marketers & agencies looking for automated acquisition & retention
Commerce Max
For brands & agencies looking for retail media on the open internet
Commerce Grid
For media owners, agencies, and retailers looking to connect media and commerce with programmatic
Commerce Yield
For retailers, marketplaces & commerce companies looking to control, scale, and maximize digital asset monetization
Back
Technology
Commerce-focused tech that maximizes outcomes
Addressability
Learn about our multi-pronged addressability strategy for the ecosystem
AI Engine
Removes the guesswork to save time and reach your KPIs
Predictive Bidding
Bids based on the predicted value of each user to save you money
Product Recommendations
Intent-based recommendations that drive more sales
Shopper Graph
Connects shopper IDs & commerce data to scale and optimize your campaigns
Solutions
Back
Back
Performance Media
Digital advertising solutions for every stage of the shopper journey
Customer Acquisition
Reach new people who are likely interested in you but don't know you yet
Customer Retention
Increase customer lifetime value from people who already know you
Dynamic Retargeting
Increase conversions from people who know you with personalized product ads
Audiences
Find and keep your next top customer with the largest commerce dataset
Video Advertising
Drive discovery and engagement with online video
Contextual Advertising
Level up your targeting by combining commerce data and contextual data
Back
Retail Media
Activation & monetization solutions for brands, agencies, and retailers
Retail Media
Reach and convert shoppers with relevant ads near the digital point of sale
Resources
Back
Back
General
Insights, education, Criteo updates, and more
Resource Center
Reports, guides, webinars, and more to inform your ad strategy
Blog
Fresh insights on commerce media and digital advertising
Success Stories
How others have realized their goals by partnering with Criteo
Consumer Trends
The latest consumer data for 20 countries and 600+ product categories
Glossary
Definitions of the most common digital advertising terminology
Addressability
Learn about our multi-pronged addressability strategy for the ecosystem
Help Center
FAQs, guides, and more to help you maximize your Criteo campaigns
Events
See where Criteo will be next
Back
Creative Formats
Ad formats and a gallery of real-world ad examples
Digital Ad Formats
Explore our ad formats for video, adaptive, rich media, and more
Ad Gallery
Real-world examples for a variety of formats, verticals, and regions
Dynamic Creative Optimization+
Real-time creative decisioning that scales to make sure your ads are seen
About
Back
Back
About
Company
Get to know Criteo
Investors
Information for investors
In the News
Press releases and mentions
Diversity, Equity and Inclusion
Our DEI pillars, goals, and more
Sustainability
Our approach for a sustainable future
Product Ethics
How we ensure ethical advertising
Trust Center
Our ad ethics, privacy, and security practices
Careers
Explore open opportunities
Search for:
Search
Select your Language
Deutsch
English
Español
Français
Italiano
Polski
Português
Pусский
한국어
中文
日本語
English
My Account
Contact Sales
Privacy Policy
Table of Contents
Privacy Policy
Disable Criteo services on Internet browsers
Disable Criteo services on mobile applications
How we use your data
How Criteo services work across environments
Your rights
Our partners
CCPA Privacy Policy
Welcome! This is where you can learn about Criteo, the technologies and services we offer to our partners, and our data collection and privacy policies.
Disable Criteo services
Our activity
Criteo helps brands, e-commerce sites and other advertisers (“Advertisers”) promote their products and services. We do that by enabling Advertisers to tailor their campaigns and/or offers to audiences that they want to reach with content that they wish to promote, which in turns means that you may receive advertising that may be of interest to you on the websites, mobile applications and other platforms of our partners (the “Publishers” or “Partners”).
How do our services work?
Criteo does not use any data that allows us to identify you directly, such as your first and last name, postal address, email address in plain text, etc.
When you browse an Advertiser’s website or mobile application that uses our technologies, that technology allows us to collect a limited amount of data relating to your browsing, such as the products you have viewed, put in your shopping cart and purchased.
Find out more about the type of data collected by Criteo
. This navigation data is linked to a unique identifier, namely an identification cookie or any other similar technology (such as mobile advertising identifiers and non-cookie technologies) depending on your navigation environment.
When you browse a Publisher’s website or mobile application that also uses our technologies, the Publisher notifies us, either directly or through an advertiser exchange, that an advertising space is available to offer you personalized advertising. The Criteo technology, working with our Advertisers, then may decide to purchase that advertising space.
The advertising you see from our partners when using our technology is based on our recommendation algorithms.
Practical example
Here is one way our technology allows us to provide you with ads that may be of interest to you:
When users visit an Advertiser website using our technologies, data relating to their browsing events are collected.
Example of data collected by Criteo:
The user with the cookie identifier 123f94d8-a745-4f8b-a1d0-bf6fbbd60058 (let’s name it “Criteo ID 123” for convenience) viewed product A on 01/01/2018 at 13:37 while browsing www.example-advertiser.com.
Our technologies compare these data with the aggregated data available on the Advertiser’s website.
Example of aggregated data available:
In general, users who purchased Product A on www.example-advertiser.com also purchased Product B on this website
In general, Product C is popular on this website
When users browse a Publisher website, we are informed of the availability of advertising spaces.
Example of data collected by Criteo:
An advertising space with the following characteristics (size, visibility, etc.) is available on www.example-publisher.com that the Criteo ID 123 is about to browse
Then our algorithms determine the relevance for buying the advertising space and displaying a personalized ad on it.
Example of decision that would be taken by Criteo: Buy the advertising space available on www.example-publisher.com and display an ad featuring the following products:
Product A, because the user with the Criteo ID 123 showed interest in it during a recent session
Product B, because the user with the Criteo ID 123 is likely to be interested in this product since he/she has viewed product A during a recent session
Product C, because this product is popular.
If you disable Criteo services, we will not display any personalized ads to you. On the other hand, the advertising space may be purchased by another company to display personalized or non-personalized ads. If you want to disable Criteo services,
click here
.
Please note that the use of our technologies on our partners’ websites and mobile applications is governed by their privacy policies, which can be accessed directly from their websites and/or mobile applications. We require them to provide you with complete and appropriate information and, to the extent required by law, to obtain your consent before any of your personal information is available to us.
Our technologies are able to work in a similar fashion:
on a webpage by relying on cookies, which are supported by most web browsers;
on a mobile application by relying on the mobile advertising ID provided by mobile operating system vendors (e. g. Google and Apple);
on an browser which default settings limit the use of third-party cookies and inter-site tracking, such as Safari, if you provide consent for our services to co-exist with these default settings;
and in a transversal way between the different environments listed above. Find out more about
how our services work from one environment to another (“cross-device linking”)
.
In order to provide you with ads that are better tailored to your interests, we may receive and process audience and segments information derived from the data you accepted to share with trusted third party partners. These partners may send us information regarding your shopping habits (e.g. interested in clothing, furniture or electronics), the points of interest that are near you based on non-precise geolocation information (e.g. stores that are geographically close to you) or the products you have been purchasing in a brick and mortar store of the advertisers that are using our services to manage their online marketing campaigns. In such case, Criteo will only process geolocation information and identifiers (such as cookie IDs and Mobile Advertising IDs) that do not allow us to know who you are.
We believe that the personalization of ads is beneficial to you and the Internet ecosystem in that it contributes to the promotion of a free and open Internet by allowing Publishers to monetize the content they create, while allowing you to benefit from ads that may be more interesting to you than non-personalized ads that would be displayed to you.
Our privacy pillars
We have developed our services and technologies taking great care to respect your privacy.
Data minimisation
We undertake never to use any data that allows us to identify you directly, such as your first and last name, postal address, email address in plain text, etc. Without ever being able to identify you personally, our technologies are able to recognize your devices and/or browsers on the basis of an identifier consisting of a series of characters (identifier contained in a cookie or other). However, these data are qualified as personal data by European regulations and personal information by Californian law. As such, they are the subject of our greatest vigilance in terms of security and respect for your privacy.
Privacy by design
Our product teams develop every feature with privacy in mind; it’s the cornerstone of Privacy by Design, Criteo’s long-standing practice and commitment to ensuring industry-leading privacy, security and safety for consumers and marketers.
Key elements include:
As required by the GDPR, we have had a designated Data Privacy Officer since 2013 along with a team of privacy experts.
These experts sit within the Product and R&D organization. They perform ongoing Privacy Impact Assessments to monitor potential risks during the product lifecycle and proactively mitigate those risks.
The Data Privacy team delivers company-wide privacy training, enforces codes of conduct, and is integral to ensuring that we build best-in-class products and services.
We regularly review and document our internal policies, amend existing privacy policies as necessary, and enforce these policies with our partners and vendors.
Criteo's commitments
Our ads do not require:
To collect data that allows us to identify you directly, such as your first and last name, your postal address, or your email address in plain text.
To collect sensitive information (such as religion, political opinion, health or sexual orientation …) to create segments or target ads to users. For the sole purpose of serving ads on a Publisher’s properties that could possibly reveal sensitive information (eg. a medical website), we may collect the URL of the website or the name of the mobile application.
To collect irrevocable identifiers, such as the hardware identifiers of the devices you use (UDID or MAC address, etc.).
To collect data related to your precise geolocation in real time.
Criteo supports industry initiatives for greater transparency in personalized advertising
Criteo has been involved from an early stage in initiatives to promote greater transparency and user control over personalized advertising.
Digital Advertising Alliance
Criteo complies with the
Digital Advertising Alliance’s (DAA) self-regulatory principles for online behavioural advertising
and is integrated on the
DAA’s “YourAdChoices” unsubscription platform
, which gives you the opportunity to express your online advertising choices to all its participants, including your desire to disable their services.
European Digital Advertising Alliance
Criteo complies with the
self-regulatory principles of the European Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA)
. The Criteo Dynamic Retargeting service has been independently certified by the EDAA for data protection.
Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada
Criteo respects the
self-regulatory principles of the Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)
and is present on the
DAAC’s unsubscribe platform “YourOnlineChoices”
, which offers you the opportunity to express your choices regarding online advertising to all its stakeholders, and in particular your desire to disable their services.
Network Advertising Initiative
Criteo adheres to the
codes of conduct of the Network Advertising Initiative (NAI)
and is integrated with the
NAI unsubscription platform
, which offers you the opportunity to express your choices regarding online advertising to all the players involved, and in particular your desire to disable their services.
IAB Europe
Criteo participates in the
IAB Europe Transparency & Consent Framework
and complies with its Specifications and Policies. Criteo’s identification number within the framework is 91.
Criteo imposes a high level of requirements on its partners
We contractually require that the Advertisers and Publishers with whom we work to comply with the
Criteo Advertising Guidelines
and
Supply Partner Guidelines
, as well as with the various regulations applicable to the protection of personal data, and in particular the GDPR.
By using the Criteo Services, they undertake, where the applicable regulations require it:
to include on their websites and mobile applications the appropriate notice and information, allowing users to know more about our services and to object to them through this notice; and
to collect the consent of users prior to the placement of cookies or any similar technology for the purpose of displaying personalized advertisements.
In order to help our partners meet their legal and contractual obligations, we regularly share industry best practices with them.
Google’s Privacy Sandbox
We participate in testing the Google Privacy Sandbox, a set of technologies to enable digital advertising without using third-party cookies in Google Chrome. With your consent, and as part of the testing, Criteo may store and access data on your device or browser, including by setting new cookies, that
relates to your web browsing interests and to ad measurement. In accordance with applicable data protection laws, you have the right to withdraw your consent at any time on this
page
. For more information about the Google Privacy Sandbox please see
https://privacysandbox.com/
.
Your data, your choice
Understand my rights
in relation to my personal data.
Learn more about
how we use your data
.
Disable Criteo services
.
Contact us
.
Changes to our privacy policy
Please note that we may update or change this privacy policy. If we revise our privacy policy, we will post those changes to this privacy statement, and to other places we deem appropriate, so that you are aware of what information we collect, how we use it, and under what circumstances, if any we disclose it. If we make any material changes we will notify you by means of a notice on this site prior to the change becoming effective.
Last updated : 11/03/2022
Criteo Trend Tracker
Data & Insights to Know and Share
Sub-policy 2
https://www.adobe.com/privacy/general-data-protection-regulation.html:
GDPR is here. And Adobe enterprise solutions are ready.
Make privacy a positive part of your customer experience.
What we’ve done to prepare for GDPR.
Adobe enterprise solutions are GDPR-ready, so you can spend less time thinking about compliance and more time focusing on your customers—creating experiences just for them. We’ve developed GDPR features and tools to help you quickly manage your data, identify and label data types that are actionable under a GDPR access or delete request, and execute requests through multiple paths. Here’s more on what we’re doing toward GDPR readiness.
Certified Security Controls
We’re protecting data entrusted to us through the Adobe Common Controls Framework with multiple processes and controls that also comply with security certifications, standards, and regulations, including SOC-2 and ISO 27001.
Learn more about our compliance efforts ›
Data transfer we cover
Adobe relies on the following mechanisms when transferring data from Europe to the U.S.: We are certified to the Swiss-U.S. Privacy Shield frameworks for individual-related data, so when you use our services you can rely on this framework for the transfer of data from Switzerland to the U.S.; and, we enter into Standard Contractual Clauses for the transfer of data from the EU to the U.S.
Go to our Privacy Center for more details and how to request Standard Contractual Clauses ›
Records of processing
We’re documenting our privacy practices to comply with enhanced record-keeping requirements.
Data protection team
We have a Chief Privacy Officer, EU Data Protection Officer, and a dedicated privacy team.
Product and process innovation
We are continuously listening to our customers and looking for ways to simplify and automate our product and service offerings to better support their GDPR needs.
Privacy by Design
We’re continuing our long-standing practice of proactively incorporating privacy features into our product development that meet and exceed current regulations. Privacy by Design is how we build our solutions. It’s part of our mission to help you responsibly unlock the power of data.
Contract terms
We’ve updated Adobe’s Data Processing Agreement to account for GDPR requirements. To request your copy of the new DPA, please complete the form in our
Data Privacy Center
.
Get started with our GDPR Basics page
We’re here to guide you through the GDPR landscape.
We believe privacy is a key part of the digital experience. With Adobe, you have a partner that builds products and services with Privacy by Design. You can be confident that we will keep up with future security and privacy needs, because we’re involved with shaping best practices, codes, guidelines, and standards. We participate in key industry forums for the ad tech ecosystem, such as IAB Europe and EDAA. We also partner with consent management providers to offer integrations that address enhanced consent requirements.
Get more resources and support in our GDPR Learning Center
Products built with privacy in mind that put individuals at the center of the experience.
Adobe enterprise products are built with Privacy by Design. They transform your business to create content and documents, build campaigns, manage media buying, and gain deep business intelligence. Get additional information on specific Adobe solutions with our individual GDPR product pages and Adobe Experience Platform page.
Adobe Advertising Cloud
Learn how your advertising can be GDPR-ready.
Go ›
Adobe Analytics
Find out how to prepare for data subject requests
Go ›
Adobe Audience Manager
Learn how privacy by design features can help.
Go ›
Adobe Campaign
Get guidance on personalization and GDPR.
Go ›
Document Cloud
Ensure that your document workflows are GDPR-ready.
Go ›
Adobe Experience Platform
See how your experience marketing technology can be GDPR-ready.
Go ›
Language Navigation
Language Navigation
Choose your region
Selecting a region changes the language and/or content on Adobe.com.
Americas
Argentina
Brasil
Canada - English
Canada - Français
Chile
Colombia
Latinoamérica
México
Perú
United States
Europe, Middle East and Africa
Africa - English
Belgique - Français
Belgium - English
België - Nederlands
Danmark
Deutschland
Eesti
España
France
Greece - English
Ireland
Israel - English
Italia
Latvija
Lietuva
Luxembourg - Deutsch
Luxembourg - English
Luxembourg - Français
Magyarország
Middle East and North Africa - English
Nederland
Norge
Polska
Portugal
România
Saudi Arabia - English
Schweiz
Slovenija
Slovensko
Suisse
Suomi
Sverige
Svizzera
Türkiye
United Arab Emirates - English
United Kingdom
Österreich
Česká republika
България
Россия
Україна
ישראל - עברית
الإمارات العربية المتحدة
الشرق الأوسط وشمال أفريقيا - اللغة العربية
المملكة العربية السعودية
Asia Pacific
Australia
Hong Kong S.A.R. of China
India - English
Indonesia
Indonesia - English
Malaysia
Malaysia - English
New Zealand
Philippines - English
Pilipinas
Singapore
Thailand - English
Vietnam - English
Việt Nam
भारत
ประเทศไทย
中国
中國香港特別行政區
台灣地區
日本
한국
Sub-policy 3
https://www.amazon.co.uk/gp/help/customer/display.html?nodeId=201909010:
Main content
Search
ALT
+
/
Basket
shift
+
ALT
+
C
Home
shift
+
ALT
+
H
Orders
shift
+
ALT
+
O
Show/Hide shortcuts
shift
+
ALT
+
Z
To move between items, use your keyboard's up or down arrows.
Find more solutions
Security and Privacy
›
Legal Policies
›
Privacy Notice
Last Updated: 1 August, 2024
To see prior version, click
here
.
We know that you care how information about you is used and shared and we appreciate
            your trust in us to do that carefully and sensibly. This Privacy Notice describes
            how we collect and process your personal information through Amazon websites, devices,
            products, services, online and physical stores, and applications that reference this
            Privacy Notice (together "Amazon Services").
Controllers of Personal Information
What Personal Information About Customers Does Amazon Europe Collect?
For What Purposes Does Amazon Europe Process Your Personal Information?
What About Cookies and Other Identifiers?
Does Amazon Europe Share Your Personal Information?
How Secure Is Information About Me?
What About Advertising?
What Information Can I Access?
What Choices Do I Have?
Are Children Allowed to Use Amazon Services?
How Long Do We Keep Your Personal Information?
EU-US and Swiss-US Data Privacy Framework
EU General Data Protection Regulation and UK Data Protection Laws - Legal Basis
Contacts, Notices and Revisions
Related Practices & Information
Examples of Information Collected
1. Controllers of Personal Information
Amazon Europe Core SARL, Amazon EU SARL, and Amazon Media EU SARL, all three at 38
            avenue John F. Kennedy, L-1855, Luxembourg and Amazon Digital UK Limited of 1 Principal
            Place, Worship Street, London, EC2A 2FA, UK (together "Amazon Europe") are data controllers
            of personal information collected and processed through Amazon Services. Details can
            be found
here
.
2. What Personal Information About Customers Does Amazon Europe Collect?
We collect your personal information in order to provide and continually improve our
                  products and services.
Here are the types of personal information we collect:
Information you give us:
we receive and store any information you provide in relation to Amazon Services.
                        Click
here
to see examples of what we collect. You can choose not to provide certain information
                        but then you might not be able to take advantage of many of our Amazon Services.
Automatic information:
we automatically collect and store certain types of information about your use of
                        Amazon Services including your interaction with content and services available through
                        Amazon Services. Like many websites, we use cookies and other unique identifiers and
                        we obtain certain types of information when your web browser or device accesses Amazon
                        Services and other content served by or on behalf of Amazon Europe on other websites.
                        Click
here
to see examples of what we collect.
Information from other sources:
we might receive information about you from other sources such as updated delivery
                        and address information from our carriers, which we use to correct our records and
                        deliver your next purchase more easily. Click
here
to see examples of the information we receive.
3. For What Purposes Does Amazon Europe Process Your Personal Information?
We process your personal information to operate, provide, and improve the Amazon Services
                  that we offer our customers. These purposes include:
Purchase and delivery of products and services.
We use your personal information to take and handle orders, deliver products and
                  services, process payments, and communicate with you about orders, products and services,
                  and promotional offers.
Provide, troubleshoot, and improve Amazon Services.
We use your personal information to provide functionality, analyse performance, fix
                  errors, and improve usability and effectiveness of the Amazon Services.
Recommendations and personalisation.
We use your personal information to recommend features, products, and services that
                  might be of interest to you, identify your preferences, and personalise your experience
                  with Amazon Services.
Provide voice, image and camera services
. When you use our voice, image and camera services, we process your voice input,
                  images, videos, and other personal information to respond to your requests, provide
                  the requested service to you, and improve our Amazon services. For more information
                  about Alexa voice services click
here
.
Comply with legal obligations.
In certain cases, we collect and use your personal information to comply with laws.
                  For instance, we collect from sellers information regarding place of establishment
                  and bank account information for identity verification and other purposes.
Communicate with you.
We use your personal information to communicate with you in relation to Amazon Services
                  via different channels (e.g., by phone, email, chat).
Advertising.
We use your personal information to display interest-based ads for features, products,
                  and services that might be of interest to you. To learn more, please read our
Interest-Based Ads notice
.
Fraud prevention and credit risks.
We process personal information to prevent and detect fraud and abuse in order to
                  protect the security of our customers, Amazon Europe, and others. We may also use
                  scoring methods to assess and manage credit risks.
Purposes for which we seek your consent.
We may also ask for your consent to process your personal information for a specific
                  purpose that we communicate to you. When you consent to our processing your personal
                  information for a specified purpose, you may withdraw your consent at any time and
                  we will stop processing of your data for that purpose.
4. What About Cookies and Other Identifiers?
We use cookies and similar tools to enhance your shopping experience, provide our
            services, understand how customers use our services so we can make improvements, and
            display ads. Approved third parties also use these tools in connection with our display
            of ads. To enable our systems to recognise your browser or device and to provide Amazon
            Services to you, we use cookies. For more information about cookies and how we use
            them, please read our
Cookies Notice
. You can manage your cookie preferences
here
.
5. Does Amazon Europe Share Your Personal Information?
Information about our customers is an important part of our business and we are not
               in the business of selling our customers' personal information to others. Amazon Europe
               shares customers' personal information only as described below and with Amazon.com,
               Inc. and the subsidiaries that Amazon.com, Inc. controls that are either subject to
               this Privacy Notice or follow practices at least as protective as those described
               in this Privacy Notice.
Transactions involving third parties:
We make available to you services, products, applications, or skills provided by
                        third parties for use on or through Amazon Services. For example, you can order products
                        from third parties through our stores, download applications from third-party application
                        providers from our App Store, and enable third-party skills through our Alexa services.
                        We also offer services or sell product lines jointly with third-party businesses,
                        such as co-branded credit cards. You can tell when a third party is involved in your
                        transactions and we share customer personal information related to those transactions
                        with that third party.
Third party service providers:
We employ other companies and individuals to perform functions on our behalf. Examples
                        include fulfilling orders for products or services, delivering packages, sending postal
                        mail and e-mail, removing repetitive information from customer lists, analysing data,
                        providing marketing assistance, providing search results and links (including paid
                        listings and links), processing payments, transmitting content, assessing and managing
                        credit risk, and providing customer service. These third-party service providers have
                        access to personal information needed to perform their functions, but may not use
                        it for other purposes. Further, they must process the personal information in accordance
                        with this Privacy Notice and as permitted by applicable data protection laws.
Business transfers:
As we continue to develop our business, we might sell or buy other businesses or
                        services. In such transactions, customer information generally is one of the transferred
                        business assets but remains subject to the promises made in any pre-existing Privacy
                        Notice (unless, of course, the customer consents otherwise). Also, in the unlikely
                        event that Amazon.com, Inc. or substantially all of its assets are acquired, customer
                        information will of course be one of the transferred assets.
Protection of Amazon Europe and others:
We release account and other personal information when we believe release is appropriate
                        to comply with the law; enforce or apply our Conditions of Use and other agreements;
                        or protect the rights, property or safety of Amazon Europe, our users or others. This
                        includes exchanging information with other companies and organisations for fraud protection
                        and credit risk reduction.
Other than as set out above, you will receive notice when personal information about
                        you might be shared with third parties and you will have an opportunity to choose
                        not to share the information.
Transfers out of the European Economic Area and the UK.
Whenever we transfer personal information to countries outside of the European Economic
            Area or the UK, we ensure that the information is transferred in accordance with this
            Privacy Notice and as permitted by the applicable laws on data protection. We rely
            on European Commission adequacy decisions or use contracts with standard safeguards
            published by the European Commission (you can ask
Customer Service
for a copy of these) and similar measures under UK laws for such transfers.
6. How Secure is Information About Me?
We design our systems with your security and privacy in mind.
We work to protect the security of your personal information during transmission by
                        using encryption protocols and software.
We follow the Payment Card Industry Data Security Standard (PCI DSS) when handling
                        credit card data.
We maintain physical, electronic and procedural safeguards in connection with the
                        collection, storage and disclosure of personal customer information. Our security
                        procedures mean that we may ask you to verify your identity before we disclose personal
                        information to you.
Our devices offer security features to protect them against unauthorised access and
                        loss of data. You can control these features and configure them based on your needs.
                        Click
here
for more information on how to manage the security settings of your device.
It is important for you to protect against unauthorised access to your password and
                        to your computers, devices, and applications. We recommend using a unique password
                        for your Amazon account that is not utilized for other online accounts. Be sure to
                        sign off when you finish using a shared computer. For more information on how to sign
                        off click
here
.
7. What About Advertising?
Third-party advertisers and links to other websites:
Amazon Services may include third-party advertising and links to other websites and
                        apps. Third party advertising partners may collect information about you when you
                        interact with their content, advertising, and services. For more information about
                        third-party advertising at Amazon Europe, including interest-based ads, please read
                        our
Interest-Based Ads notice
. To adjust your advertising preferences, please go to the
Advertising Preferences page
.
Use of third-party advertising services:
We provide ad companies with information that allows them to serve you with more
                        useful and relevant Amazon ads and to measure their effectiveness. We never share
                        your name or other information that directly identifies you when we do this. Instead,
                        we use an advertising identifier like a cookie, a device identifier, or a code derived
                        from applying irreversible cryptography to other information like an email address.
                        For example, if you have already downloaded one of our apps, we will share your advertising
                        identifier and data about that event so that you will not be served an ad to download
                        the app again. While we do not share your specific shopping actions like purchases,
                        product views, or searches with ad companies, we may share an advertising identifier
                        and an estimate of the value of the ads they show you on our behalf so they can serve
                        you with more effective Amazon ads. Some ad companies also use this information to
                        serve you relevant ads from other advertisers. You can learn more about how to opt-out
                        of interest-based advertising by going to the
Advertising Preferences page
.
8. What Information Can I Access?
You can access your information, including your name, address, payment options, profile
            information, Prime membership, household settings, and purchase history in the "Your
            Account" section of the website. Click
here
for a list of examples that you can access.
9. What Choices Do I Have?
If you have any questions or objection as to how we collect and process your personal
            information, please contact our
Customer Service
. Many of our Amazon Services also include settings that provide you with options
            as to how your information is being used.
As described above, you can choose not to provide certain information but then you
                        might not be able to take advantage of many of the Amazon Services.
You can add or update certain information on pages such as those referenced in the
Information You Can Access?
section. When you update information, we usually keep a copy of the previous version
                        for our records.
If you don't want to receive e-mail or other communications from us, please adjust
                        your
Customer Communication Preferences
. If you don't want to receive in-app notifications from us, please adjust your notification
                        settings in the app or your device.
If you don't want to see interest based-ads, please adjust your
Advertising Preferences page
.
The Help feature on most browsers and devices will tell you how to prevent your browser
                        or device from accepting new cookies, how to have the browser notify you when you
                        receive a new cookie or how to disable cookies altogether. Because cookies allow you
                        to take advantage of some essential features of Amazon Services, we recommend that
                        you leave them turned on. For instance, if you block or otherwise reject our cookies,
                        you will not be able to add items to your Shopping Basket, proceed to Checkout, or
                        use any Amazon Services that require you to Sign in. For more information about cookies,
                        see our
Cookies Notice
.
You can consent to or withdraw consent from third party advertising cookies
here
.
If you want to browse our websites without linking browsing activity to your account,
                        you may do so by logging out of your account
here
and disabling cookies on your browser.
You can manage the recommendations you receive in our store
here
, remove recommendations you don't want to see
here
(select a recommendations tile for products you have not previously purchased, select
                        View All and Manage, then select the Remove Items toggle), and edit your browsing
                        history
here
.
When you consent to our processing your personal information for a specified purpose,
                        you may withdraw your consent at any time and we will stop any further processing
                        of your data for that purpose.
You will also be able to opt out of certain other types of data processing by updating
                        your settings on the applicable Amazon website (e.g., in "Manage Your Content and
                        Devices"), device, or application. For more information click
here
. Most non-Amazon devices also provide users with the ability to change device permissions
                        (e.g., disable/access location services, contacts). For most devices, these controls
                        are located in the device's settings menu. If you have questions about how to change
                        your device permissions on devices manufactured by third parties, we recommend you
                        contact your mobile service carrier or your device manufacturer as different devices
                        may have different permission settings.
If you are a seller, you can add or update certain information in
Seller Central
, update your account information by accessing your
Seller Account Information
, and adjust the email or other communications you receive from us by updating your
Notification Preferences
.
If you are an author, you can add or update the information you have provided in the
                        Author Portal and Author Central by accessing your accounts in the
Author Portal
and
Author Central
, respectively.
In addition, subject to applicable law, you have the right to request access to, correct,
            and delete your personal data, and to ask for data portability. You may also object
            to our processing of your personal data or ask that we restrict the processing of
            your personal data in certain instances. If you wish to do any of these things, please
            contact
Customer Service
or, to submit a data subject access request, go to
Request My Data
.
10. Are Children Allowed to Use Amazon Services?
Amazon Europe doesn't sell products for purchase by children. We sell children's products
            for purchase by adults. If you're under 18, you may use Amazon Services only with
            the involvement of a parent or guardian. For more information on how we handle personal
            information for Amazon Services intended for children under the age of 13, please
            read our
Children Privacy Notice
.
11. How Long Do We Keep Your Personal Information?
We keep your personal information to enable your continued use of Amazon Services,
            for as long as it is required in order to fulfil the relevant purposes described in
            this Privacy Notice, as may be required by law such as for tax and accounting purposes,
            or as otherwise communicated to you. For example, we retain your transaction history
            so that you can review past purchases (and repeat orders if desired) and what addresses
            you have shipped orders to, and to improve the relevancy of products and content we
            recommend.
12. EU-US and Swiss-US Data Privacy Framework
Amazon.com, Inc. and certain of its controlled US
affiliates
(together, the Amazon Group Companies, or "We") participate in the EU-US Data Privacy
            Framework, the UK Extension to the EU-US Data Privacy Framework, and Swiss-US Data
            Privacy Frameworks* regarding the collection, use, and retention of personal information
            from European Union and European Economic Area member countries, the United Kingdom,
            and Switzerland. We have certified with the Department of Commerce that we adhere
            to the Data Privacy Framework Principles. To learn more about the Data Privacy Framework
            Principles, see
here
.
If you have any inquiries or complaints about our handling of your personal information
            under the Data Privacy Framework, or about our privacy practices generally, please
            contact us at: eu-privacy@amazon.co.uk. We will respond to your inquiry promptly.
            If you have an unresolved privacy or data use concern that we have not addressed satisfactorily,
            please contact our U.S.-based third party dispute resolution provider (free of charge)
            at
https://www.verasafe.com/public-resources/dispute-resolution/submit-dispute/
. If neither Amazon nor our provider resolves your complaint, you may pursue binding
            arbitration through the Data Privacy Framework Panel. To learn more about the Data
            Privacy Framework Panel, see
here
.
As explained
here
we sometimes provide personal information to third parties to perform services on
            our behalf. If we transfer personal information received under the Data Privacy Framework
            to a third party, the third party's access, use, and disclosure of the personal information
            must also be in compliance with our Data Privacy Framework obligations, and we will
            remain liable under the Data Privacy Framework for any failure to do so by the third
            party unless we prove we are not responsible for the event giving rise to the damage.
You can review our Data Privacy Framework registration
here
. The Amazon Group Companies are subject to the investigatory and enforcement powers
            of the Federal Trade Commission (FTC). We may be required to disclose personal information
            that we handle under the Data Privacy Framework in response to lawful requests by
            public authorities, including to meet national security or law enforcement requirements.
*
We will not rely on the Swiss-US Data Privacy Framework or the UK Extension to the
               EU-US Data Privacy Framework until each enters into force, but we adhere to their
               required commitments in anticipation of their doing so.
13. EU General Data Protection Regulation and UK Data Protection Laws - Legal Basis
The EU GDPR and UK data protection laws require a legal basis for our use of personal
               information. Our basis varies depending on the specific purpose for which we use personal
               information. We use:
Performance of a contract
when we provide you with products or services, or communicate with you about them.
                        This includes when we use your personal information to take and handle orders, deliver
                        products and services, and process payments.
Our legitimate business interests and the interests of our customers
when we improve Amazon services (including when we use your voice, video, or camera
                        input to improve services), when we detect and prevent fraud and abuse in order to
                        protect the security of our customers, ourselves, or others, and when we provide you
                        with interest-based advertising.
Your consent
when we ask for your consent to process your personal information for a specific
                        purpose that we communicate to you. When you consent to our processing your personal
                        information for a specified purpose, you may withdraw your consent at any time and
                        we will stop processing of your data for that purpose.
Compliance with a legal obligation
when we use your personal information to comply with laws. For instance, we collect
                        seller place of establishment and bank account information for identity verification
                        purposes.
These and other legal bases
depending on the purpose for which we use personal information.
14. Contacts, Notices & Revisions
If you have any concern about privacy at Amazon Europe or want to contact one of our
            data controllers, please
Customer Service
with a thorough description and we will try to resolve the issue for you. Further,
            the data protection officer for the above mentioned data controllers can be contacted
            at eu-privacy@amazon.co.uk. You can file a complaint with our principal supervisory
            authority, the
Commission Nationale pour la Protection des Données in Luxembourg
, the
Information Commissioner's Office
, or with another local authority.
Our business changes constantly and our Privacy Notice will change also. You should
            check our website frequently to see recent changes. Unless stated otherwise, our current
            Privacy Notice applies to all information that we have about you and your account.
            We stand behind the promises we make, however, and will never materially change our
            policies and practices to make them less protective of customer information collected
            in the past without the consent of affected customers.
15. Related Practices & Information
Conditions of Use and Sale
Help Desk
Most Recent Purchases
Your Profile and Community Guidelines
16. Examples of Information Collected
Information You Give Us When You Use Amazon Services
You provide information to us when you:
search for products or services in our stores;
place an order through Amazon Services;
download, stream, view, or use content on a device, or through a service or application
                        on a device;
provide information in
Your Account
(and you might have more than one if you have used more than one e-mail address or
                        mobile number when shopping with us) or
Your Profile
;
talk to or otherwise interact with our Alexa Voice service;
upload your contacts;
configure your settings on, provide data access permissions for, or interact with
                        an Amazon device or service;
provide information in your
Seller Account
,
Kindle Direct Publishing (KDP)
account, Developer account or any other account we make available that allows you
                        to develop or offer software, goods, or services to Amazon customers;
offer your products or services on or through Amazon Services;
communicate with us by phone, e-mail, or otherwise;
complete a questionnaire, a support ticket, or a contest entry form;
upload or stream images, videos or other files to Prime Photos, Amazon Drive, or other
                        Amazon Services;
compile Playlists, Watchlists, Wish Lists or gift registries;
Participate in community features, provide and rate
Customer Reviews
;
specify a Special Occasion Reminder; or
employ Product Availability Alerts, such as Available to Order Notifications.
As a result of those actions, you might supply us with such information as: your name;
                  address and phone number; payment information; your age; your location information;
                  your IP address; people, addresses and phone numbers listed in your Addresses ; e-mail
                  addresses of your friends and other people; content of reviews and e-mails to us;
                  personal description and photograph in
Your Profile
; voice recordings when you speak to Alexa; images and video collected or stored in
                  connection with Amazon Services, information and documents regarding identity and
                  standing; corporate and financial information; credit history information; VAT numbers;
                  and device log files and configurations, including Wi-Fi credentials, if you choose
                  to automatically synchronise them with your other Amazon devices.
Automatic Information
Examples of the information we collect and analyse include:
the Internet protocol (IP) address used to connect your computer to the Internet;
login; e-mail address; password;
the location of your device or computer;
content interaction information, such as content downloads, streams, and playback
                        details including duration and number of simultaneous streams and downloads, and network
                        details for streaming and download quality, including information about your internet
                        service provider;
device metrics such as when a device is in use, application usage, connectivity data,
                        and any errors or event failures;
Amazon Service metrics (e.g., the occurrences of technical errors, your interactions
                        with service features and content, your settings preferences and backup information,
                        location of your device running an application, information about uploaded images
                        and files (e.g., file name, dates, times and location of your images));
version and time zone settings;
purchase and content use history, which we sometimes aggregate with similar information
                        from other customers to create features such as Best Sellers;
the full Uniform Resource Locators (URL) clickstream to, through and from our website
                        (including date and time); cookie number; products and/ or content you viewed or searched
                        for; page response times, download errors, length of visits to certain pages, page
                        interaction information (such as scrolling, clicks, and mouse-overs),
phone numbers used to call our customer service number; and
images or videos when you shop in our stores using Amazon Services.
We may also use device identifiers, cookies, and other technologies on devices, applications
                  and our web pages to collect browsing, usage or other technical information for fraud
                  prevention purposes.
Information From Other Sources
Examples of information we receive from other sources include:
updated delivery and address information from our carriers or other third parties,
                        which we use to correct our records and deliver your next purchase or communication
                        more easily;
account information, purchase or redemption information and page-view information
                        from some merchants with which we operate co-branded businesses or for which we provide
                        technical, fulfillment, advertising or other services;
information about your interactions with products and services offered by our subsidiaries;
search results and links, including paid listings (such as Sponsored Links);
information about internet-connected devices and services that you've linked with
                        Alexa; and
credit history information from credit bureaus, which we use to help prevent and detect
                        fraud and to offer certain credit or financial services to some customers.
Information You Can Access
Examples of information you can access through Amazon Services include:
status of recent orders (including subscriptions);
your complete order history;
personally identifiable information (including name, e-mail, password, communications
                        and personalised advertising preferences, address book and 1-Click settings);
payment settings (including payment card information and gift voucher, gift card and
                        cheque balances);
e-mail notification settings (including Product Availability Alerts, Deliveries, Special
                        Occasion Reminders, and newsletters);
recommendations and the products you recently viewed that are the basis for recommendations
                        (including Recommended for You and Improve Your Recommendations);
shopping lists and gift registries (including Wish Lists and Baby and Wedding Registries);
your content, devices, services, and related settings, and communications and interest-based
                        advertising preferences;
content that you recently viewed;
voice recordings associated with your account;
Your Profile (including your product Reviews, Recommendations, Reminders and personal
                        profile).
If you are a seller, you can access your account and other information, and adjust
                        your communications preferences, by updating your account in
Seller Central
.
If you are an author, you can access your account and other information, and update
                        your account, on the
Kindle Direct Publishing (KDP)
or
Author Central
website, as applicable.
If you are a developer participating in our Developer Services Program, you can access
                        your account and other information, and adjust your communications preferences, by
                        updating your account in the Developer Services Portal, developers.amazon.com.
Was this information helpful?
Yes
No
Thank you for your feedback.
Please select what best describes the information:
This information is confusing or wrong
This isn't the information I was looking for
I don't like this policy
Submit
Thanks. While we're unable to respond directly to your feedback, 
	we'll use this information to improve our online Help.
‹
All help topics
Legal Policies
Conditions of Use & Sale
Privacy Notice
Amazon Anti-Counterfeiting Policy
Non-Exhaustive List of Amazon Trademarks
Previous versions of Legal policies
Miscellaneous Reporting
Children's Privacy Notice
Fair Use Policy
Human Rights and Environmental Grievances
Communications with Amazon Employees
3rd Party Licensing Notice
Quick solutions
Your orders
                                            Track and return orders
Your orders
Track and return orders
Returns and refunds
                                            Return or exchange items
Returns and refunds
Return or exchange items
Carrier info
                                            Delivery carrier information
Carrier info
Delivery carrier information
Manage Prime
                                            Cancel or view benefits
Manage Prime
Cancel or view benefits
Payment settings
                                            Add or edit payment methods
Payment settings
Add or edit payment methods
Account settings
                                            Change email or password
Account settings
Change email or password
Sub-policy 4
https://www.applovin.com/privacy:
Products
AppDiscovery
Acquire your ideal users
MAX
Monetize your app
SparkLabs
Create ads that perform
AppLovin Exchange
Reach your audience
Array
Increase value across customer’s lifecycle
Adjust
Measure your marketing
Wurl
Our streaming TV solution
Solutions
Increase ARPDAU
Grow Ad Inventory
Acquire App Users
Increase IAPs
Resources
Success Stories
Blog
Video Library
Guides and Reports
Glossary
Events
Partners
View all resources
More about us
Jobs
NEW
Press
About Us
Sign Up
Sign In
ENG
中文
日本語
한국어
Privacy Policy
Overview
Policies
Privacy Policy
隐私政策
Datenschutzerklärung
プライバシーポリシー
개인정보 보호 정책
Política de Privacidade
Politique de confidentialité
AppLovin Partners
AppLovin Policies for Publishers
AppLovin Policies for Demand Partners
AppLovin Array Privacy Policy
Terms
Terms of Use
使用协议条款
Vereinbarung über die Nutzungsbedingungen
利用規約
이용 약관 계약
Contrato de Termos de Uso
Accord sur les Conditions d’utilisation
DMCA Notice
End User License Agreement — Software
AppLovin Array Terms of Service
APPLOVIN PLATFORM DATA PROCESSING AGREEMENT
AppLovin Demand Partner Data Processing Agreement
Effective Date
: October 30, 2024
You can find the prior version
here
.
AppLovin Corporation (“we,” “us,” “our,” or “AppLovin”) operates a suite of tools for app developers and other businesses to automate and optimize the marketing and monetization of their platforms, products, or services by enabling the placement of different types of advertisements on digital properties including mobile apps, websites, and connected TV devices (collectively, the “Advertising Services” or “Services”).  As explained below, consumers interact with us in a few ways, primarily through advertisements served by AppLovin on behalf of advertisers.
The AppLovin Privacy Policy (this “Privacy Policy”) explains how we collect, use, and share information through our Services and advertising platform, and our corporate website at www.applovin.com (the “Website”), as well as your choices related to that information.
Contents
Our Advertising Services
Our Website
Additional Provisions for EU/UK/Swiss Individuals
U.S. Multistate Privacy Notice
Policy Changes
Contact Us
Our Advertising Services
This section describes the information we collect, use, and share through our Advertising Services.
General Information Collection and Use
If you are a consumer who downloads and uses an application which contains the AppLovin SDK or otherwise interacts with the Services through advertisements served within a digital property, we may collect certain information, including the following:
Device, App, and Browser Data
Device make, model, and operating system;
Device properties related to screen size, orientation, audio, battery, device memory usage, settings, and boot time;
Device settings related to accessibility features, font size, and theme;
Carrier;
Name and properties of mobile application through which a consumer interacts with the Services;
Country, time zone, and locale settings (country and preferred language);
Network connection type and speed;
IP Address;
Internet browser user-agent used to access the Services;
HTTP header information;
Advertising IDs (IDFA/GAID/Amazon FOSAID);
Vendor IDs (IDFV);
App Set IDs; and
Advertising and tracking preferences and restrictions.
Application publishers may choose to share with us additional information including your age or year of birth, gender, email, phone number, and interest segments for purposes of their own direct ad serving.  We do not retain this data or pass it downstream to advertising partners.  Please see the applicable publisher’s privacy policy for more information about their use of first party data.
Advertisers (through the advertiser itself or through a third party service provider on behalf of such advertiser) may also share transactional or “event” data related to a consumer’s interaction with an application, such as information about the actions taken in an application like purchases or application installations.
Information Collection and Use Specific
to
e-Commerce Ads Only
If you are a consumer who interacts with the Services through an e-commerce platform or a merchant website, we may collect certain additional information (that you provided to the e-commerce platform or merchant, through a third party’s API, our SDK, pixel, or other similar technologies), including the following:
User IDs;
Shopping browsing behavior (e.g., views) and search history;
Records of products purchased or considered (e.g., added to cart, check out);
Purchasing histories; and
Information regarding user interactions with advertising partners and their merchant partners’ sites and advertisements.
How We Collect Your Information
This information may be collected automatically across mobile apps and devices or received from third-parties across different technologies over time. We may also combine information we collect with other information we derive through analytical techniques, and we will use that combined information to offer the Services.
How We Use Your Information
We generally use the information we collect to:
Deliver the Services, maintain, and improve them, including our AI-powered advertising technology, and research and develop new ones;
Promote safety, security, and integrity of Services;
Provide measurement, analytics, and reporting; and
Comply with legal and regulatory obligations.
We use AI-powered advertising technology (sometimes referred to as “automated decision-making”) to help us improve our advertising products and Services and serve ads that are relevant and interesting to you. We use it in ways that do not produce legal or similarly significant effects on you (for example, by reordering how advertisements might appear when you visit a digital property such as a mobile app or a website).
Information Sharing
We may share information we collect or derive with third parties in the following contexts:
Service Providers.
We transfer information to service providers, and other partners who support our business, such as providing technical infrastructure services, analyzing how our Services are used, measuring the effectiveness of ads and services, providing customer service, or facilitating payments. These partners must adhere to strict confidentiality obligations in a way that is consistent with this Privacy Policy and the agreements we enter into with them.
Affiliates.
We may share information within the AppLovin family of companies for purposes consistent with this Privacy Policy.
Advertising Partners.
We share information with our third-party advertising partners, including advertisers, ad networks, exchanges, demand side platforms, merchants, other advertising partners (who aggregate their own demand sources), and ad optimization and measurement/attribution partners (e.g., mobile measurement partners or “MMPs”) to provide our clients with Advertising Services. This information may be used by such third-party partners to measure how effective ads are, show advertisements to end users for products and services that are more likely to appeal to them (a practice known as interest-based advertising or behavioral advertising), and to undertake web analytics to analyze traffic and other ad activity to improve the advertising experience.
Unless otherwise noted in our partner list, each AppLovin advertising partner is an independent controller of your data. You can view a list of AppLovin advertising partners with whom we share your data
here
, current as of the date listed at the top of that page.
If you do not want to receive interest-based advertisements, please see the
“Manage Your Privacy Choices”
section below. If you are located in the European Union, UK, or Switzerland, you may also see the
“Additional Provisions for EU/UK/Swiss Individuals”
section below for more options. If you are an individual resident of the U.S. states that have enacted comprehensive consumer privacy laws, you may also review the “
U.S. Multistate Privacy Notice
” section below for more options.
Please note that the practices of our third-party advertising partners delivering advertisements through our Services are subject to those partners’ own privacy policies.
Regulatory or Legal Requirements.
We may disclose information to governmental regulatory authorities as required by law, including for tax or accounting purposes, in response to their requests for such information or to assist in investigations. We may also disclose personal information to third parties in connection with claims, disputes, or litigation, when otherwise required by law or court order.
Safety and Terms Enforcement.
We may disclose information if we determine, in our sole discretion, that its disclosure is necessary to protect the health, safety, or rights of you or any other person, protect against fraud, or enforce our legal rights, including contractual commitments made to us by third parties.
Business Transfers.
We may disclose personal information as part of an organizational business transaction, such as a merger, acquisition, joint venture, financing, or sale of organizational assets and may transfer personal information to a third party as one of the business assets in such a transaction. We may also disclose personal information in the event of insolvency, bankruptcy, or receivership.
Manage Your Privacy Choices:
To limit collection of information from mobile devices, please visit your device’s settings to set the “Limit Ad Track” or other similar features on your device. Additionally, you may opt-out of interest-based advertising within ads served by AppLovin. For detailed instructions, see
How AppLovin Shows You Ads
. You can also make choices about data collection for certain companies by visiting an industry consumer choice platform such as the NAI (
https://optout.networkadvertising.org/
) or DAA (
https://optout.aboutads.info/
).  You may still receive ads after limiting processing of information for interest-based advertising, but those ads may be less relevant to your interests.
To see or manage the data collected by AppLovin from your device, you may download the AppLovin Privacy Management Application from the Apple or Google Play Stores:
By navigating through the tabs in the AppLovin Privacy Management Application, you can erase the personal information that AppLovin may have collected about you or request a copy of that personal information.
Children’s Privacy
We do not knowingly collect personal information from, or serve advertisements to, children as defined and required by applicable laws. If you believe we have served an advertisement to a child or might have any personal information from or about a child, or if you believe a mobile application in which an AppLovin-served advertisement appeared may be designed for, directed to, or pass personal information knowingly from, children in violation of our policies, please contact us via email at
dataprotection@applovin.com
.
Data Security and Retention
We implement reasonable measures to help secure the information we collect through the Services. We retain the data we collect through the Services for up to 2 years. Information is automatically purged from our system if the Services do not receive any updated information for a device in the last 2 years. Note that we will retain information in our systems for as long as necessary to comply with our legal obligations, resolve disputes, and enforce our agreements.
[END OF ADVERTISING SERVICES-SPECIFIC PROVISIONS]
Our Website
This section describes the information we collect, use, and share through our Website.
Cookies and Other Similar Technology
The Website uses cookies, web beacons, or other similar technology to collect information for various purposes, including interest-based advertising. This information may include your IP address, device identifier, browser type, device type, the date and time of your visit, and the areas of the Website you visit. To learn more about and manage the cookies on this Website, please click “Cookie Settings” in our Website footer. You may also be able to limit the use of cookies through your browser settings. Note that certain parts of the Website may not function properly without cookies. Additionally, you may still receive ads after limiting processing of information for interest-based advertising, but those ads may be less relevant to your interests. If you erase your cookies, reset your device identifier, or use different browsers or devices, you may need to make your choices again.
We partner with Google Analytics to learn more about how you use our Website. For more information about how Google Analytics works you can visit
here
. To opt-out of Google Analytics, you can visit
here
and follow the instructions.
Additional Information Collection for Business Account Owners
When you register with AppLovin to use our Services, you may provide us with personal information such as your name, email address, phone number, mailing address, user name, and password. You may also provide us with payment information when you submit or receive a payment, or other information when you complete the online forms available on the Website. We may also acquire information from other trusted sources to update or supplement the information that you voluntarily provide to us or that we collect automatically.
How We Use Your Information
We may use the information we collect or you provide to us through the Website for various purposes, including:
To communicate with you, for example through newsletters or with other information about our products and services;
To operate and improve the Website and our Services;
To customize the Website;
For analytics and research;
For marketing purposes; and
For purposes disclosed at the time of collection.
Information Sharing
We may share information we collect through the Website in the following contexts:
With your consent;
For advertising and marketing purposes;
In response to a subpoena, court order, or other legal process;
To protect our rights and the rights of others;
With our affiliates;
With service providers that help us operate the Website and Services;
As part of a sale, merger, or acquisition, including at bankruptcy; and
For purposes disclosed at the time of collection.
Links to Other Websites
The Website may provide links to other websites or other digital properties that we do not control. We encourage you to review the privacy policy of those digital properties that you may visit.
Updating Information
You can update the personal information you provide to us by correcting, updating, or deleting the information associated with you via your AppLovin account. To add, modify, remove, or request access to the personal information about you that we hold, please see the
“Contact Us”
section below.
Your Marketing Choices
If you no longer wish to receive marketing-related emails from us on a going-forward basis, you may opt out of receiving these emails by clicking “Unsubscribe” at the bottom of any marketing email you receive from us or by emailing us at
dataprotection@applovin.com
.
Children
Our Website is not intended for use by children as defined and required by applicable law. We do not knowingly collect personal information from children through the Website. If you believe we might have any personal information from or about a child, please contact us via email at
dataprotection@applovin.com
.
Data Security and Retention
We have implemented reasonable physical, technical, and administrative security measures for the Website to help protect information we collect and store.
For detailed information regarding retention associated with cookies on the applovin.com domain, please click “Cookie Settings” in our Website footer to learn more.
We retain other information such as customer contact and payment information in our systems for as long as necessary as permitted by law to comply with our legal obligations, resolve disputes, and enforce our agreements.
[END OF WEBSITE-SPECIFIC PROVISIONS]
Additional Provisions for EU/UK/Swiss Individuals
If you are located in the European Union, United Kingdom, or Switzerland, the following additional provisions apply to you.
Data Privacy Framework
AppLovin complies with the EU-U.S Data Privacy Framework (EU-U.S. DPF), the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (Swiss-U.S. DPF) as set forth by the U.S. Department of Commerce.
AppLovin has certified to the U.S. Department of Commerce that it adheres to the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Principles (EU-U.S. DPF Principles) with regard to the processing of personal data received from the European Union and the United Kingdom in reliance on the EU-U.S. DPF and the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF.  AppLovin has certified to the U.S. Department of Commerce that it adheres to the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Principles (Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles) with regard to the processing of personal data received from Switzerland in reliance on the Swiss-U.S. DPF. If there is any conflict between the terms in this Privacy Policy and the EU-U.S. DPF Principles and/or the Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles, the Principles shall govern. To learn more about the Data Privacy Framework (DPF) program, and to view our certification, please visit
https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/
.
If you are an EU, UK, or Swiss individual, where we transfer your personal data to third party servicer providers (see above) who perform services for us or on our behalf, we are responsible for the processing of that data by them and shall remain liable if they process your personal data in a manner inconsistent with the DPF Principles, unless we are not responsible for the event giving rise to the damage.
With respect to personal data received or transferred pursuant to the Data Privacy Framework, AppLovin is subject to the regulatory enforcement powers of the U.S. Federal Trade Commission. In certain situations, AppLovin may be required to disclose personal data in response to lawful requests by public authorities, including to meet national security or law enforcement requirements.
In compliance with the EU-U.S. DPF, the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. DPF, AppLovin commits to resolve DPF Principles-related complaints about our collection and use of your personal information. EU, UK, and Swiss individuals with inquiries or complaints regarding our handling of personal data received in reliance on the EU-U.S. DPF, the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. DPF should first contact AppLovin at
dataprotection@applovin.com
. AppLovin refers unresolved complaints to TRUSTe, an alternative dispute resolution provider based in the United States.  If you do not receive timely acknowledgment of your DPF Principles-related complaint from us, or if we have not addressed your DPF Principles-related complaint to your satisfaction, please visit
https://feedback-form.truste.com/watchdog/request
for more information or to file a complaint.  These dispute resolution services are provided at no cost to you.
For complaints regarding DPF compliance not resolved by any of the other DPF mechanisms, you have the possibility, under certain conditions, to invoke binding arbitration. Further information can be found on the official DPF website.
Lawful Basis for Processing
On certain occasions, we process your personal data when it is necessary for the performance of a contract to which you are a party, such as to provide services to you. We may also process your personal data to respond to your inquiries concerning our products and services.
On other occasions, we process your personal data where required by law. We may also process your personal data if necessary to protect your interests or the interests of a third party.
Additionally, we process your personal data when necessary to do so for fraud prevention, improving our network and services, and marketing our services to advertisers and publishers, where these interests are not overridden by your data protection rights.
If the processing of your personal data is necessary, we will generally ensure that consent has been obtained from you if there is no other lawful basis for such processing. You have the right to withdraw your consent to processing of personal data at any time.
If personal data covered by this Privacy Policy is to be used for a new purpose that is materially different from that for which the personal data was originally collected or subsequently authorized, or is to be disclosed to a non-agent third party in a manner not specified in this Privacy Policy, we will provide you with an opportunity to choose whether to have your personal data so used or disclosed. Requests to opt out of such uses or disclosures of personal data should be sent to us as specified in the “Contact” section below. Certain personal data, such as information about medical or health conditions, racial or ethnic origin, political opinions, religious or philosophical beliefs, is considered “Sensitive Information”. AppLovin does not collect or seek to elicit “Sensitive Information”.
For questions about data processing, please contact our Data Protection Officer. Visit the “Contact” section below for contact information.
Your Rights
If you are an individual in the EU, UK, or Switzerland, you are able:
To request access to the personal data we hold about you;
To request that we rectify or erase your personal data;
To request that we restrict or block the processing of your personal data;
Under certain circumstances, to receive personal data about you that we store and transmit to another without hindrance from us, including requesting that we provide your personal data directly to another, i.e., a right to data portability; and
Where we previously obtained your consent, to withdraw consent to processing your personal data.
To exercise these rights, please contact us at the email address set forth in the
“Contact Us”
section below.  Our Data Protection Officer can also be reached at this email address.  Please be aware that we may be unable to afford these rights to you under certain circumstances, such as if we are legally prevented from doing so.
In certain circumstances, you may appoint an authorized agent to exercise any rights that you may have on your behalf.  If you choose to exercise any rights through an authorized agent, you will need to verify your identity directly with us before we can process any requests.  In addition, we will need written documentation demonstrating the authorized agent’s authority to act on your behalf.
Additionally, you have the right to lodge a complaint against us. To do so, contact the supervisory authority in your country of residence.
EU and UK Privacy Representatives
We have appointed
Prighter Group
as our privacy representatives in the EU and UK.  You can contact us through our privacy representatives at the following addresses:
For residents of the EU
:
PrighterGDPR-Rep by Maetzler Rechtsanwalts GmbH & Co KG
c/o AppLovin Corporation
Kriegerstraße 44
30161 Hannover
Germany
For residents of the UK
:
PrighterUK-Rep by Prighter Ltd.
c/o AppLovin Corporation
20 Mortlake Mortlake High Street
London, SW14 8JN
United Kingdom
Additional information regarding our privacy representatives can be found at the following link:
https://prighter.com/q/19826057144
.
[END OF EU/UK/SWISS SPECIFIC PROVISIONS]
U.S. Multistate Privacy Notice
Additional provisions for individual residents of the U.S. states that have enacted comprehensive consumer privacy laws are included in our
U.S. Multistate Privacy Notice
, which explains how those residents may exercise their privacy rights.
Policy Changes
We may, in our sole discretion, make changes to this Privacy Policy from time to time in order to accommodate new technologies, industry practices, regulatory requirements, or for other purposes. If we make any changes, we will update the “Effective Date” posted at the top of this Privacy Policy. If we make any material changes, we may notify you by email (sent to the email address specified in your account) or by means of a notice on the Website prior to the change becoming effective. We encourage you to review this Privacy Policy periodically to ensure that you understand how we collect, use, and share information.
Any changes to this Privacy Policy will become effective when the revised Privacy Policy is posted on the Website. By continuing to use the Website or Advertising Services following such changes, you are agreeing to accept the terms of the revised Privacy Policy.
Contact Us
If you have any questions or comments about this Privacy Policy, please write to us at:
Data Protection Officer
AppLovin Corporation
1100 Page Mill Road
Palo Alto, CA 94304
You can also contact us or our Data Protection Officer via email at
dataprotection@applovin.com
.
Please be sure to include your relevant account information in any correspondence to us.  This will help ensure that we can respond to your inquiry in a timely manner.
If you have a customer care issue, please visit
AppLovin Support
.
Sub-policy 5
https://www.appnexus.com/en/company/platform-privacy-policy:
Microsoft Invest
Microsoft Invest is a demand-side platform built for the future of video advertising. With an integrated platform advantage and a focus on data-driven performance, Invest enables you to engage audiences on all screens and drive business results.
Sign up
Benefits of Microsoft Invest
Integrated Platform Advantage
Technology designed to maximize digital investments.
Data-Driven Performance
Intelligent, customizable data solutions that power campaign performance.
Built for the Future of Video
Enabling buyers to engage the audience – not the device.
Key features of Microsoft Invest
Deal buying
Exclusive audiences
Planner
Premium CTV
Deal buying from our Inventory library
An intuitive and graphics-based approach to deal discovery and activation, offering access to curated premium deal catalogs and more visibility into deal inventory than you’ve ever had before.
Discover exclusive curated catalogs created by premium data owners and available off-the-shelf to reach audiences at scale.
Exclusive audiences
Reach more than a billion
1
users with Microsoft’s valuable audiences, including millions you may not be reaching anywhere else.
Planner
Gain confidence in campaign planning, focusing on the data that matters to you before you go live.
Pairing Invest with Planner allows you to: plan cross-channel, boost digital investments, find the right audience and discover premium inventory, eliminate planning and buying silos.
Premium CTV marketplace, featuring Netflix
Engage audiences on all screens and drive business results by tapping into our marketplace for premium inventory, from our direct publishers on Monetize or through our robust integrations with all major SSPs​.
Case study
GroupM – Microsoft Audiences
The road to rave results: How GroupM powered a Continental Tires campaign leveraging Microsoft’s audience intelligence.
Learn more
Case study
Open up new advertising opportunities with Microsoft Invest
Existing customers are encouraged to reach out to their account managers.
Sign up
Frequently asked questions
End-to-end platform with a buy and sell-side tech infrastructure offering increased efficiency, such as 100% DSP-to-SSP match rates, campaign delivery stability, bid shading applied to all bids, and no discrepancy fees, allowing for competitive and transparent take-rates.
Ability for buyers to build custom bidding algorithms to replace or complement existing optimization, using our Data Science Toolkit.
Open and well-documented Enterprise APIs allow buyers to build their proprietary solution on top of our platform, using our robust log-level data offering.
Direct and expanded access to Curate’s deal library – including curated deals from external SSPs
A future-proof, multidimensional approach to solve identity.
Direct supply and far-reaching integrations with leading supply partners globally.
A buy and sell-side tech infrastructure that delivers 100% DSP-to-SSP match rates, campaign delivery stability, bid shading applied to all bids at no cost, and no discrepancy fees, allowing for competitive – and transparent – take-rates.
Expansive investments in supply chain transparency, in-house and partnered holistic brand safety solutions, and efficient supply strategy and decisioning through duplication analysis, harnessing years of data science and impression-level data analysis.
Flexible ways to transact through outcome-based buying, Programmatic Guaranteed, and sophisticated deal curation capabilities.
Microsoft Invest offers exclusive access to Microsoft’s in-market and demographic audience segments, to reach more than one billion users programmatically.
Microsoft Invest offers a range of intelligent and customizable data solutions to power campaign performance.
A choice of identity solutions that combine trusted consumer relationships, unique audiences and a flexible identity suite to help you reach the audiences that matter.
Exclusive privacy-safe consumer data sets, including search and web activity from Bing and our browser Microsoft Edge, LinkedIn professional profiles and demographics - to access highly engaged audiences and reach 1 billion users including millions you may not be reaching anywhere else.
Ability to activate advertiser first-party data and access tailored, detailed insights that will inform your buying strategy.
Support of major industry ID solutions, in complement to first-party ID solutions to optimize campaign reach and precision.
Access to a data marketplace of more than 40+ global data partners to inform behavioral and contextual strategies.
More than a decade-long track record of powering advanced buyers with the most customizable enterprise solutions.
Out-of-the-box optimization and inventory recommendation powered by machine learning, along with intuitive UI-based customization options.
A Data Science toolkit provides unique tools to deploy custom bidding algorithms and measurement solutions tailored to business outcomes.
Invest has a variety of capabilities that enable you to engage the audience, not the device, helping you reach the goals that matter most.
Robust video and CTV feature set including video KPI optimization and reporting and video inventory recommendations to discover relevant premium video inventory to maximize the reach and performance of your campaigns.
Expansive CTV publisher supply and 3rd-party integrations with leading CTV partners to reach audiences on every screen.
Streamlined access to a wide range of Microsoft or third-party curated deals.
Increased functionality focused on getting campaigns running faster; troubleshooting and monitoring; expanded optimization and tailored reporting.
Flexible support offerings and services with ongoing support/troubleshooting for managed serviced, self-serve.
Training programs that include in-person training and E-learning curriculums.
[1] 2023 Microsoft Invest first-party data.
Xandr Platform Privacy Policies
Xandr Digital platform cookie policy
Xandr Political advertising
Your input makes us better
Take our quick 3-minute survey and help us transform your website experience.
Take survey
Dismiss
Sub-policy 6
http://www.dentsu.com/termsofuse/data_policy.html:
Dentsu Group Global Data Protection Principles
Sub-policy 7
https://www.ebay.com/help/policies/member-behaviour-policies/user-privacy-notice-privacy-policy?id=4260#section12:
859986509146
df105723-1d37-4efe-ac2b-8f71ec659348:1959432a8ed
19997
Page navigation
Home
Customer Service
User Privacy Notice
On this page
1. Scope and updates of this User Privacy Notice
2. Controller
3. Data protection officer and contact
4. What personal data we collect and process
5. Purposes and legal basis for data processing and categories of recipients
6. Cross-border data transfers
7. Storage duration and erasure
8. Rights as a data subject
9. Cookies & similar technologies
10. Data security
11. Other important information regarding data protection
12. Regional and State Privacy Disclosures
Previous User Privacy Notice
In our User Privacy Notice we have compiled all essential information about our handling of your personal data and your corresponding rights.
This User Privacy Notice is effective from
April 8, 2024
.
View the previous User Privacy Notice
.
Expand all
1. Scope and updates of this User Privacy Notice
This User Privacy Notice applies to your use of this website and all eBay applications, services (including payment services), products and tools (collectively the "Services") provided by eBay Inc. or its affiliates (eBay Inc. and the companies it directly or indirectly controls are referred to as "eBay Affiliates"). This User Privacy Notice applies regardless of how you access or use these Services, including access via mobile devices and apps. For additional regional and state disclosures, please see section
12. Regional and State Privacy Disclosures
below.
Learn more about section 1
This User Privacy Notice also applies if reference is made to it via a link or in a similar manner, e.g. on websites of partners on which Services from eBay are offered.
We may change this User Privacy Notice at any time by posting the revised User Privacy Notice on this website and indicating the effective date of the revised User Privacy Notice. You will be notified of any material changes to this User Privacy Notice via My Messages in My eBay and/or by email.
2. Controller
Which eBay Affiliate is responsible for the collection and processing of your personal data in connection with the provision of the Services depends on how you use our Services.
2.1 Use of the Services (except payment services for sellers)
Depending on the region in which you reside, one of the following eBay Affiliates is responsible for the collection and processing of your personal data in connection with the provision of our Services (except payment services for sellers). Your region of residence is determined based on your account registration address (as a registered user) or your location (when not registered):
USA
: eBay Inc., 2025 Hamilton Avenue, San Jose, CA 95125, USA
Canada
: eBay Canada Limited, 240 Richmond Street West, 2nd Floor Suite 02-100 Toronto, Ontario, M5V 1V6, Canada
EU
: eBay GmbH, Albert-Einstein-Ring 2-6, 14532 Kleinmachnow, Germany
United Kingdom
: eBay (UK) Limited, 1 More London Place, London, SE1 2AF, United Kingdom
India
: eBay Singapore Services Private Limited, 1 Raffles Quay, #18- 00, Singapore 048583
For all other countries
: eBay Marketplaces GmbH, Helvetiastrasse 15/17, 3005 Bern, Switzerland
2.2 Use of the payment services for sellers
Depending on the region in which you reside or where your payments are processed, the following eBay Affiliates are responsible for the collection and processing of your personal data in connection with the provision of our payment services to you as a seller:
USA
: eBay Commerce Inc., 2065 Hamilton Ave., San Jose, CA 95125, USA
EEA/CH
: eBay S.à r.l., 22-24 Boulevard Royal, L-2449 Luxembourg
UK:
eBay Commerce UK Ltd., 1 More London Place, London SE1 2AF, United Kingdom
Canada:
eBay Commerce Canada Limited, 44 Chipman Hill, Suite 1000, Saint John NB E2L 2A9, Canada
Australia:
eBay Commerce Australia Pty. Ltd., Level 18, 1 York Street, Sydney NSW 2000, Australia
For all other countries:
eBay Commerce Inc., 2065 Hamilton Ave., San Jose, CA 95125, USA
As described in our
Payments Terms of Use
- opens in new window or tab
, your personal data may be processed by one or more of these entities depending on your location and the eBay website on which a user completes a transaction with you.
3. Data protection officer and contact
We have appointed data protection officers in several countries to oversee the protection of your personal data. You will find the contact details of your data protection officer in the
list of our data protection officers
- opens in new window or tab
in our
eBay Privacy Center
- opens in new window or tab
.
Furthermore, if you have any questions or complaints regarding this User Privacy Notice, our global data protection principles (see section
6.1 Data transfers to eBay Affiliates
under section
6. Cross-border data transfers
below) or our handling of personal data, you can contact the eBay Privacy Team or the controller who is responsible for the processing of your personal data at any time (for further information, see section
2. Controller
above). This applies regardless of whether we have appointed a data protection officer in your country. You can find all necessary information and
contact details
- opens in new window or tab
in our
eBay Privacy Center
- opens in new window or tab
.
4. What personal data we collect and process
We collect your personal data when you use our Services, create a new eBay account, provide us with information via a web form, add or update information in your eBay account, participate in online community discussions or otherwise interact with us. We also collect personal data from other sources (such as other eBay Affiliates, credit agencies or bureaus, and data providers).
Learn more about section 4
In total, we collect the following personal data:
4.1 Personal data you provide when using our Services or creating an eBay account
Data that identifies you, such as your name, address, telephone numbers, email addresses, username or tax identification number that you provide when setting up your eBay account or at a later date.
If you use our Services as a seller, additional identification data, such as, government-issued ID (e.g. social security number), date of birth, tax identification numbers (such as VAT identification number), business registration numbers, identification documents and information contained on IDs, selfie photos, and other information (such as bank account number) that you provide when using our payment and other services as a seller.
Data regarding bids, purchases, or sales that you provide in a transaction.
Content that you share with other users through our messaging tools (see
Filtering of messages sent via our messaging tools
under section
11. Other important information regarding data protection
for more information).
Financial information (e.g. credit card and account numbers, transaction details, and form of payment).
Shipping, billing, and other information you provide, as well as information required for customs clearance (such as tax identification numbers or other identification numbers) and relevant shipping information (such as shipment numbers and tracking information) if shipped through one of our programs.
In some cases: age, gender, country of birth, nationality, country of residence, employment status, family status, interests and preferences.
When you submit a report to eBay: Data that identifies you, such as your name and email address, and additional information that you provide with your report.
You may provide us with additional information through a web form or by updating or adding information to your eBay account, by participating in community discussions, member chats, surveys, inquiries, dispute resolution, customer service calls recorded with your consent, or if you contact us for any other reason regarding our Services.
Other data that we are required or entitled by applicable law to collect and process and that we need for your authentication or identification, or for the verification of the data we collect.
4.2 Personal data we collect automatically when you use our Services or create an eBay account
Data that is generated as part of one of your transactions (e.g. as relating to bids, purchases, sales, fees) or that is linked to your eBay account as a result of a transaction in which you are involved, such as transaction amounts, time and location of transactions and form of payment or payout method.
Data that is generated through your other actions when you use our Services and which is linked to your eBay account (e.g. eBay account numbers, your currency preference, when you place items in your shopping cart, place items on the watchlist, save sellers, searches or interests, follow users, or seek to use the services of third-party partners for payments or otherwise).
Data regarding all other interactions with our Services, your advertising preferences, and your communications with us.
Location data, including your general location data (e.g. IP address) and, with your permission, the precise location data of your mobile device. Please note that for most mobile devices, you can manage or disable the use of precise location services for all applications in the settings menu of your mobile device.
Certain metadata recording the settings of your camera included in images of items you upload for sale.
Computer and connection information, such as statistics regarding your use of our Services, information on data traffic to and from websites, referral URL, information on advertisements, your IP address, your access times including accessed pages within our Services, your language settings and your weblog information.
4.3 Personal data we collect in connection with the use of cookies and similar technologies
We use cookies and similar technologies to collect data in connection with our Services. We collect this data from the devices (including mobile devices) with which you use our Services. The data collected includes the following usage- and device-related information:
Data about the pages you visit, the access time, frequency and duration of visits, the links on which you click and other actions you take as part of your use of our Services and in advertising and email content.
Data about your activities and interactions with our advertising partners including data about the advertisements you were shown, how often they were shown, when and where they were shown, and whether you took any action, such as clicking on an advertisement or making a purchase.
The user segment or category into which you as a user fall, for example: female, 20-49 years old, interested in sneakers.
Model or device type, operating system and version, browser type and settings, device ID or individual device identifier, advertisement ID, individual device token, and cookie-related data (e.g. cookie ID).
The IP address from which your device accesses our Services.
Location data, including your general location data (e.g. IP address) and, with your permission, the precise location data of your mobile device. Please note that most mobile devices allow you to manage or disable the use of precise location services for all applications in the settings menu.
For more information about our use of these technologies and your choices, see section
9. Cookies & similar technologies
.
4.4 Personal data from other sources
We also collect personal data about you from other sources and from third parties to the extent permitted by applicable law. In particular, this includes the following data:
Data from public sources (e.g. public sanctions lists) or that is publicly available online.
Data from credit agencies or bureaus (e.g. credit reports/checks, identity confirmation, data for risk modeling and setting of credit limits). For additional regional and state-specific information, please see section
12. Regional and State Privacy Disclosures
below.
Data from data providers (e.g. "Know Your Customer"/identity verification, demographic, interest-based and online advertising related data).
With regard to our payment services for sellers: data from government or other sources concerning any previous convictions of the respective seller, to the extent permitted by applicable law.
We combine or connect the personal data we collect from you with data from these other sources. Where personal data is disclosed to us by third parties, we take steps to ensure that these third parties are legally permitted to disclose your personal data to us. We also receive access to personal data about you from eBay Affiliates.
4.5 Social network data you share with us
We allow you to use providers of single sign-on services (such as Google, Facebook, or Apple) with whom you already have an account to create an eBay account or to link your eBay account to such single sign-on services. You can determine the personal data that we can access when authorizing the connection with the single sign-on service.
We allow you to share personal data with social networks (such as Facebook) or to link your eBay account to a social network. These social networks may automatically provide us with access to certain personal data they have stored about you (e.g. content you have viewed or enjoyed, information about the advertisements you have been shown or clicked on, etc.). You can determine the personal data that we can access through the privacy settings of each social network.
We may also use plug-ins or other technologies from various social networks. If you click on a link displayed through a social network plug-in, you voluntarily connect to that social network.
5. Purposes and legal basis for data processing and categories of recipients
We process your personal data for various purposes and based on several different legal bases that allow this processing. For example, we process your personal data to provide and improve our Services, to provide you with a personalized user experience on this website, to contact you about your eBay account and our Services, to provide customer service, to provide you with personalized advertising and marketing communications, and to detect, prevent, mitigate and investigate fraudulent or illegal activity. We also share your information with third parties, including service providers acting on our behalf, for these purposes. In addition, we may share your personal data among eBay Affiliates in order to fulfill our contract with you under the User Agreement and, if applicable, the
Payments Terms of Use
- opens in new window or tab
.
Learn more about section 5
Below you will find a summary of the purposes for which we process your personal data, including the categories of recipients to whom we transmit personal data for the purposes stated, sorted by our legal basis for this processing or sharing:
5.1 We process your personal data in order to fulfill our contract with you and to provide you with our Services as well as for the execution of the transaction between seller and buyer. This includes the following purposes:
Processing of data relating to you or your company for the purpose of entering into a contract with you and executing it.
Provision of our Services, including but not limited to enabling and performing transactions with other users (including the display and transmission of your personal data to other users where necessary to perform the transaction, including in cases of terminated, failed or subsequently voided transactions, e.g. by sharing your return address so a buyer may return an item), displaying your transaction and feedback history to you, providing and enhancing features such as payment processing, ratings, authentication services and eBay account management, providing other services you may use (as described in connection with such services), and ensuring the functionality of our Services. In connection with the provision of our Services, we will send you notifications relating to the execution of transactions and the use of our Services in accordance with the communication preferences in your eBay account.
Enabling the delivery of purchased items by logistics/shipping service providers including notifications in connection with the delivery (such as tracking information), the latter to the extent permitted by applicable law without your consent.
Provision of our payment services in accordance with the
Payments Terms of Use
- opens in new window or tab
.
Providing general customer support including the solution of problems with your eBay account, arbitration of disputes, providing other services within the scope of customer service as well as enforcement of fee claims. For these purposes, we may contact you via notification in My eBay, email, telephone, SMS, push notification on your mobile device or by mail. If we contact you by telephone, in order to ensure efficiency, we may use automatically dialed calls with tape announcements or automated text messages in accordance with our User Agreement and
Payments Terms of Use
- opens in new window or tab
, to the extent permitted by applicable law.
Processing of general location data (such as IP address or postal code) in order to provide you with location-based services (such as radius search and other content that is personalized on the basis of your general location data).
Enforcement of our User Agreement,
Payments Terms of Use
- opens in new window or tab
, this User Privacy Notice and other rules and policies.
Publication and promotion of your listings and related content on the websites or in the applications, services and tools of eBay Affiliates or cooperating third-party operators of websites, applications, services and tools. When we share the content of your listings and any related personal data with third parties, we do so only on the basis of an agreement that limits the use of such personal data by the third party to the purposes necessary to fulfill its contractual obligations to us. Third-party providers are contractually obliged to take appropriate security measures with regard to this data. Third-party providers are strictly forbidden to pass on personal data contained in your listings to other third parties. In case of data transmissions to eBay Affiliates, such restrictions result from our Binding Corporate Rules (see section
6.1 Data transfers to eBay Affiliates
under section
6. Cross-border data transfers
below).
Enabling events for which you register (including handling the registration process and sending necessary information in the context of the event).
Where necessary, we transmit your personal data to processors and the following recipients for one or several of the purposes described above:
Other eBay users
eBay Affiliates
External service providers, authentication partners, physical storage service partners, shipping companies (such as DHL, UPS, etc.), and event agencies
Government agencies or public authorities (including customs and tax authorities)
Payment service providers
External operators of websites, applications, services and tools
5.2 We process your personal data in order to comply with legal obligations to which we are subject. This includes the following purposes:
Participation in investigations and proceedings (including judicial proceedings) conducted by public authorities or government agencies, in particular, for the purpose of detecting, investigating and prosecuting illegal acts.
Prevention, detection and mitigation (including compliance with reporting requirements) of illegal activities (e.g. fraud, money laundering, terrorist financing, child abuse and violations of sanctions legislation).
Complying with information requests from third parties based on any statutory information rights they have against us (e.g. in the event of an intellectual property infringement, product piracy, or other unlawful activity).
Complying with information collection, verification, disclosure, reporting and other requirements under consumer protection, anti-fraud, online platform and tax legislation.
Complying with data access requirements under payment services legislation (e.g. under the EU Payment Services Directive) as a provider of payment services.
Ensuring the security of our Services.
Retention and storage of your personal data to comply with specific legal retention requirements (for more information on eBay's storage of your data, see section
7. Storage duration and erasure
).
Where necessary, we transmit your personal data to processors and the following recipients for one or several of the purposes described above:
Law enforcement agencies, courts, government agencies or public authorities (including tax and financial authorities), intergovernmental or supranational bodies (in connection with our payment services provided in the EU for sellers in particular with regard to compliance with Luxembourg laws concerning FATCA dated July 7, 2015 and concerning the OECD Common Reporting Standard dated December 18, 2015)
Third parties based on statutory information claims against us, including participants in the
eBay VeRO program
- opens in new window or tab
and the PROACT program
Third-party service providers
Other third-party service providers you select to access your data under payment services legislation and as authorized in each case by you
Third parties who are involved in judicial proceedings, in particular, if they submit a legal order, court order or equivalent legal order to us
Credit agencies, bureaus, or associations, if required by applicable law (e.g. information on payment delays, payment defaults or other irregularities that may be relevant to your credit report)
eBay Affiliates
Other eBay users
5.3 We process your personal data in order to protect your vital interests or the vital interests of another natural person. This includes the following purposes:
Prevention, detection, mitigation and investigation of unlawful activities that may result in impairment of your vital interests or the vital interests of another natural person, unless there is a statutory obligation to this effect.
Where necessary, we transmit your personal data to processors and the following recipients for one or several of the purposes described above:
Law enforcement agencies, courts, government agencies or public authorities, intergovernmental or supranational bodies
Third parties who are involved in judicial proceedings
eBay Affiliates
External service providers
5.4 We process your personal data where necessary for the purposes of the legitimate interests pursued by us or by a third party, except where such interests are overridden by your interests or fundamental rights and freedoms. In order to reconcile our legitimate interests with your rights, we have introduced appropriate control mechanisms. On this basis, we process your data for the following purposes:
Participation in investigations and proceedings (including judicial proceedings) conducted by courts, law enforcement agencies, government agencies or public authorities, intergovernmental or supranational bodies, in particular for the purpose of detecting, investigating and prosecuting illegal acts, unless there is a statutory obligation to this effect, and we may legitimately assume that the disclosure of the data is necessary to avert imminent disadvantages or to report a suspicion of an illegal act. In such cases, we will only disclose what we believe is necessary, and to the extent permitted by applicable laws, such as your name, city, zip code, telephone number, email address, (previous) usernames, IP address, fraud complaints, bidding and listing history.
Protection of the legitimate interests of third parties (including participants of the
VeRO program
- opens in new window or tab
and the PROACT program) in connection with civil law disputes, including the investigation of such disputes, unless there is a statutory obligation to this effect, if we may legitimately assume that it is necessary to disclose the data to such third parties in order to avert imminent disadvantages. In such cases, we will only disclose what we believe is necessary, and to the extent permitted by applicable laws, such as the seller's name, address, city, zip code, country, telephone number, email address and company name to the third party and bind the third party by a worldwide non-disclosure agreement to treat the data as confidential.
Prevention, detection, mitigation and investigation of fraud, financial crimes and harms, violation of international sanctions legislation, security incidents and other prohibited or unlawful activities, including the assessment of corresponding risks (e.g. through the use of captchas, a port enumeration technology to identify user sessions using remote desktop tools, metadata or the telephone number stored in your eBay account for risk assessments and two-factor authentication) and the implementation of corresponding measures (e.g. disabling certain forms of payment based upon the risk associated with the underlying transaction), unless there is a statutory obligation to this effect.
Verifying that reports submitted to eBay (incl. unnamed reports) are not fraudulent or malicious.
Monitoring and improvement of the security of our Services, unless there is a statutory obligation to this effect.
Performance of identity checks, creditworthiness and other financial standing checks, evaluation of applications and comparison of information for accuracy and verification purposes.
Automatic filtering and, where necessary, manual review of messages sent through our messaging tools (including chat messages and emails sent to eBay alias email addresses) to prevent fraudulent or suspicious activity or violations of our
User Agreement
or other
rules and policies
, including enforcing the
prohibition of purchases and sales outside of eBay
, as further explained below under
Filtering of messages sent via our messaging tools
(see section
11. Other important information regarding data protection
).
Provision of functions for users that make the processing of transactions easier or more convenient (e.g. administration of several delivery addresses, updating stored payment information from time to time based on information provided by your bank or other payments services providers) or provide users with more information about their transactions (e.g., calculating CO₂ emissions from eBay purchases).
Analysis and improvement of the Services from eBay Affiliates, e.g. by reviewing site usage data or information from users about blocked or crashed pages in order to identify and solve problems and to provide you with an improved user experience, including as part of product development.
Analysis of telephone conversations with our customer service that we recorded with your consent.
Advertisements by mail (according to your communication preferences in your eBay account).
To the extent permitted by applicable law without your consent, communications with you via electronic mail (e.g. email or text message) or telephone to offer you vouchers, discounts and special offers, to conduct opinion polls and surveys, and to inform you about our Services (according to your communication preferences in your eBay account). If you no longer wish to receive marketing emails from us, you can also unsubscribe by clicking on the link in the footer of the email you received. For technical reasons, the implementation may take a few days.
For users outside the European Economic Area (EEA), Switzerland and the United Kingdom: Advertising and content personalization, measurement and analytics, on and off our sites, as explained in our
Advertising and related preferences page
- opens in new window or tab
.
Customization of page content to display the items and services you may like based on the actions you take.
Evaluation of the quality and success of our email marketing campaigns (e.g. through analysis of opening and click rates).
Assessment of the service status (e.g. on the basis of tracking information if sellers use shipping labels from shipping providers via eBay or provide tracking numbers).
Offering or facilitating the offering of partner and bonus programs and other co-branded marketing efforts (e.g. product warranties, seller financing offers or co-branded credit cards in collaboration with a third-party lender, partner, or credit card issuer), to the extent permitted by applicable law.
Provision of shared content and services (such as registration for services, transaction processing and customer service) with eBay Affiliates or cooperating payment service providers.
Initiation, preparation and execution of a company acquisition, e.g. in the event of a merger with another company or takeover by another company. If such an event occurs, we will require the merged entity to comply with this User Privacy Notice with respect to your personal data. Should your personal data be processed for any purpose not specified in this User Privacy Notice, you will be informed in advance of the processing of your data for this new purpose.
Assertion of or defense against legal claims, including those asserted by one eBay user against another eBay user.
Enabling eBay Affiliates to comply with legal obligations they are subject to, including information collection, verification, disclosure, reporting and other requirements under consumer protection, anti-fraud, online platform and tax legislation.
To comply with an impending legal obligation.
For users in the United States: investigating and communicating the outcome of disputes with the affected users (e.g. sharing information about eBay's investigation of a complaint of a user's violation of a policy with the reporting user).
Where necessary, we transmit your personal data to processors and the following recipients for one or several of the purposes described above:
eBay Affiliates
External service providers
Other eBay users
Law enforcement agencies, courts, government agencies or public authorities, intergovernmental or supranational bodies
Third parties who are involved in judicial proceedings
Participants in the
eBay VeRO program
- opens in new window or tab
, PROACT program, and other third parties in the event of an investigation for fraud, intellectual property infringement, retail crime, stolen goods, product piracy or other unlawful activity
Payment service providers
Third-party partners in furtherance of offering commercial financing opportunities
Credit agencies or bureaus, data verification services, risk assessment vendors and collections agencies (e.g. information about payment delays, payment defaults, or other irregularities that may be relevant to your credit report, or that we use to confirm your identity, model risk, establish credit limits, or collect unpaid debts)
Other companies in the context of a company acquisition
Information about your right to object to processing based on our legitimate interests can be found below under
Rights as a data subject
and, with regard to the use of cookies and similar technologies, below under
Cookies & similar technologies
.
5.5 With your consent, we process your personal data for the following purposes:
For users within the European Economic Area (EEA), Switzerland and the United Kingdom: Advertising and content personalization, measurement and analytics, on and off our sites, as explained on our
Advertising and related preferences page
- opens in new window or tab
.
Communications with you via electronic mail (such as email or text message) or telephone, including communications by eBay Affiliates or by third parties, to offer you vouchers, discounts and special offers, unless these communications are permitted without your consent under applicable law. We may engage third parties to send marketing communications on our behalf.
Processing of your precise location data to provide location-based services. Please note that most mobile devices allow you to manage or disable the use of precise location services for all applications in the settings menu.
For users within the European Economic Area (EEA): Storing your financial information (e.g. credit card and account numbers) for future transactions.
Provision of a single sign-on service allowing you to register or log in to third-party services using your eBay sign-in credentials.
For sellers, processing of your biometric data to identify you and further prevent fraud and reduce other risks on our platform, and in connection with Know Your Customer and similar compliance requirements.
Processing of your personal data on the basis of your consent, which you have given so that we or third parties can enable you to use certain services or make them available to you.
You can find information about your right to withdraw your consent below under section
8. Rights as a data subject
and information with regard to the use of cookies and similar technologies below under section
9. Cookies & similar technologies
.
Where necessary, we transmit your personal data to processors and the following recipients for one or several of the purposes described above:
eBay Affiliates
External service providers
Third parties using our single sign-on service (as authorized by you in each single case)
Other third parties with whom we partner to offer you specific services (as described at the collection of the respective user consent)
Third-party advertising partners such as Google, Meta, Microsoft, Pinterest, and TikTok, as listed on our
Advertising and related preferences page
- opens in new window or tab
5.6 Data Sharing between eBay Affiliates
As set out above under "Personal data from other sources", we also receive access to personal data about you from other eBay Affiliates. This enables us, in particular, to provide you, with your consent as legally required, with information about products and services, which we believe might interest you, and improve our products, services, content, and advertising by analyzing your use of the services of eBay Affiliates, in particular through the matching of certain data (e.g. cookie IDs). Furthermore, this allows us to better prevent, detect, mitigate and investigate fraud, security incidents and other prohibited or unlawful activities, including the assessment of corresponding risks. We will also grant access to personal data about you to other eBay Affiliates for the aforementioned purposes. To the extent that other eBay Affiliates have access to your personal data, they will follow practices that are at least as restrictive as the practices described in this User Privacy Notice.
5.7 Additional information regarding our payment services for sellers
With regard to our payment services for sellers in the EEA and Switzerland, we additionally point out that eBay S.à r.l. is subject to professional secrecy, which requires special transparency with regard to the processing and, in particular, the transmission of your personal data. We therefore expressly draw your attention to the fact that eBay S.à r.l. may pass on your personal data to trustworthy third parties and business partners where necessary to provide our payment services for sellers, as described above in this Section 5 of the User Privacy Notice. This includes in particular the following third parties and business partners:
Other payment service providers, including financial institutions
Companies offering financial products, analyses and scoring (e.g. credit agencies or bureaus)
Authorities, agencies and other governmental bodies (e.g. to combat fraud)
Auditors and other professional advisors
5.8 Automated decision-making
We use technologies that are considered automated decision making or profiling. We will not make any automated decisions about you that would significantly affect you unless such a decision is necessary for entering into, or the performance of, a contract with you, we have obtained your consent, or we are required by applicable law to use such technology. You will find information on your right to object to this processing of your data below under section
8. Rights as a data subject
.
6. Cross-border data transfers
Some recipients of your personal data are located outside your jurisdiction or have offices in jurisdictions where data protection laws may provide a different level of protection than the laws in your jurisdiction. When transferring personal data to such recipients, we provide appropriate safeguards.
Learn more about section 6
6.1 Data transfers to eBay Affiliates
The transmission of personal data between eBay Affiliates (e.g. to enable cross border transactions and for other legally permitted purposes) is based on our worldwide data protection principles, which are binding internal data protection regulations (Binding Corporate Rules, BCRs), or on the basis of other appropriate safeguards (e.g. standard data protection clauses issued or approved by the European Commission (2021/914/EU). Through our Binding Corporate Rules, eBay Affiliates undertake to protect your personal data and to comply with data protection obligations. Further information on our binding company-wide guidelines and our worldwide data protection principles can be found in the
eBay Privacy Center
- opens in new window or tab
.
6.2 Other data transfers (from the European Economic Area to third countries)
We may transfer your personal data to recipients (see section 5. Purposes and legal basis for data processing and categories of recipients) who may be located anywhere in the world. We will only transfer your personal data from the European Economic Area (EEA), United Kingdom or Switzerland to third countries, i.e. countries outside the EEA, on the basis of appropriate safeguards or if otherwise authorized by applicable law. Third countries providing an adequate level of data protection according to the European Commission currently include Andorra, Argentina, Canada (for companies covered by the Personal Information Protection and Electronic Documents Act), Switzerland (for transfers out of the EEA), the Faroe Islands, Guernsey, the State of Israel, the Isle of Man, Japan, Jersey, New Zealand, South Korea, the United Kingdom, the United States (Data Privacy Framework) and Uruguay. In other cases, eBay provides the necessary safeguards, e.g. through the conclusion of data protection contracts adopted by the European Commission (e.g. standard data protection clauses (2021/914/EU) with the recipients, or through other measures provided for by law. Additional information regarding the measures taken by us is available
on request
. We regularly re-evaluate the measures taken to assess requirements deriving from new regulatory guidance and case law.
7. Storage duration and erasure
Your personal data will be stored by us and our service providers in accordance with applicable data protection laws to the extent necessary for the processing purposes set out in this User Privacy Notice (see section
5. Purposes and legal basis for data processing and categories of recipients
for more information on the processing purposes). Subsequently, we will delete your personal data in accordance with our data retention and deletion policy or take steps to properly render the data anonymous, unless we are legally obliged or permitted to keep your personal data longer (e.g. for legal compliance, tax, accounting or auditing purposes, or to detect and prevent fraudulent or illegal activity on eBay). In Europe, the retention periods are generally between 6 and 10 years (e.g. for contracts, notifications and business letters). As far as legally permissible or required, we restrict the processing of your data instead of deleting it (e.g. by restricting access to it). This applies in particular to cases where we may still need the data for the execution of the contract or for the assertion of or defense against legal claims, or where such retention is otherwise required or permitted by law. In these cases, the duration of the restriction of processing depends on the respective statutory limitation or retention periods. The data will be deleted after the relevant limitation or retention periods have expired.
Learn more about section 7
The specific retention periods for personal data are documented in our regional data retention guidelines. How long we retain personal data may vary depending on the Services we provide and our legal obligations under applicable national law. The following factors typically affect the retention period:
Necessity for the provision of our Services
This includes such things as executing the User Agreement with you, maintaining and improving the performance of our products, keeping our systems secure, and maintaining appropriate business and financial records. Most of our retention periods are determined on the basis of this general rule.
Consent-based processing of personal data
If we process personal data on the basis of consent (including consent to the extended storage), we store the data for as long as necessary in order to process it according to your consent.
Statutory, contractual or other similar obligations
Corresponding storage obligations may arise, for example, from laws or official orders. It may also be necessary to store personal data with regard to pending or future legal disputes. Personal data contained in contracts, notifications and business letters may be subject to statutory storage obligations depending on national law.
8. Rights as a data subject
Subject to possible restrictions under national law, as a data subject, you have the right to access, rectification, erasure, restriction of processing and data portability with regard to your personal data. In addition, you can withdraw your consent and
object
to our processing of your personal data on the basis of our legitimate interests. You can also lodge a complaint with a supervisory authority.
Learn more about section 8
Your rights in detail:
Where we rely on consent you can
withdraw your consent
to the processing of your personal data by us at any time. As a result, we may no longer process your personal data based on this consent in the future. The withdrawal of consent has no effect on the lawfulness of processing based on consent before its withdrawal.
You have the right to obtain
access
to your personal data that is being processed by us. In particular, you may request information on the purposes of the processing, the categories of personal data concerned, the categories of recipients to whom the personal data have been or will be disclosed, where possible the envisaged period for which the personal data will be stored or the criteria used to determine that period, the existence of the right to request rectification or erasure of personal data or restriction of processing of personal data or to object to such processing, the right to lodge a complaint with a supervisory authority, any available information as to the personal data's source (where they are not collected from you), the existence of automated decision-making, including profiling and, where appropriate, meaningful information on its details. Your right to access shall not adversely affect the rights and freedoms of others. Your right to access may be limited by national law.
You have the right to obtain from us without undue delay the
rectification
of inaccurate personal data concerning you. Taking into account the purposes of the processing, you have the right to have incomplete personal data completed, including by means of providing a supplementary statement.
You have the right to obtain from us the
erasure
of personal data concerning you under certain conditions (e.g. when the personal data are no longer necessary in relation to the purposes for which they were processed or when they are no longer required for overriding legitimate grounds, such as the detection/prevention of fraud), unless processing is necessary for exercising the right of freedom of expression and information, for compliance with a legal obligation, for reasons of public interest or for the establishment, exercise or defense of legal claims. The right to erasure may be limited by national law.
You have the right to obtain from us
restriction of processing your personal data
to the extent that
the accuracy of the data is disputed by you,
the processing is unlawful, but you oppose the erasure of the personal data,
we no longer need the data, but you need it to assert, exercise or defend legal claims or
you have objected to the processing.
You have the right to receive the personal data concerning you, which you have provided to us, in a structured, commonly used and machine-readable format and have the right to transmit those data to another controller ("
right to data portability
").
You have the right to lodge a complaint with a
supervisory authority
. As a rule, you can contact the supervisory authority of your usual place of residence, your place of work or the registered office of the
controller
.
If your personal data is processed on the basis of our legitimate interests, you have the
right to object
to the processing of your personal data on grounds relating to your particular situation. This also applies to profiling. If your personal data is processed by us for direct marketing purposes, you have the right to object at any time to the processing of your personal data for such marketing, which includes profiling to the extent that it is related to such direct marketing.
Exercising your rights and managing your settings
You can exercise your rights as a data subject via our
Privacy Contact page
- opens in new window or tab
. In addition, you are of course free to contact the eBay Privacy Team or the controller who is responsible for the processing of your personal data at any time (for further information, see section
2. Controller
above). You can find all necessary information and
contact details
- opens in new window or tab
in our
eBay Privacy Center
- opens in new window or tab
.
The exercise of the above data subjects' rights (e.g. right to access or erasure) is generally free of charge. Where requests are manifestly unfounded or excessive, in particular because of their repetitive character, we may charge an appropriate fee (at most our actual costs), in accordance with the applicable statutory regulations, or refuse to process the application.
Managing your communication preferences
If you would like to change your preferences regarding eBay communications (including marketing communications), you can do so at any time through your account in My eBay under "Communication Preferences". If you no longer wish to receive email marketing communications from us, you can also unsubscribe by clicking on the link in the footer of the email you received. For technical reasons, the implementation may take a few days. For information on how to manage your cookies and similar technologies preferences, see the next section
9. Cookies & similar technologies
.
9. Cookies & similar technologies
When you use our Services, we and authorized third parties make use of cookies and similar technologies (which we will refer to collectively as "cookies") to provide you with a better, faster and safer user experience or to show you personalized advertising. You can find detailed information about the use of cookies and similar technologies and your choices in our
User Cookie Notice
.
Learn more about section 9
The cookies and similar technologies used in connection with the Services have different functions:
They may be technically necessary for the provision of our Services
They help us optimize our Services technically (e.g. monitoring of error messages and loading times)
They help us improve your user experience (e.g. save font size and form data entered)
They allow us to show you more relevant advertisements
We use cookies and similar technologies that remain on your device only as long as your browser is active (session cookies), as well as cookies and similar technologies that remain on your device longer (persistent cookies). We take appropriate security measures to prevent unauthorized access to our cookies and similar technologies.
Your choices regarding cookies and similar technologies
Please see our
User Cookie Notice
for more information and your choices with respect to cookies and similar technologies, or go directly to
Advertising and related preferences
- opens in new window or tab
(users in the EEA, Switzerland and the United Kingdom) or
AdChoice - eBay Advertising Preferences
- opens in new window or tab
(all users) to manage your preferences.
You are also free to disable the use of cookies and similar technologies if this is supported by your device. You can manage your cookie settings in your browser or device settings.
You can find information about third-party cookies (and similar technologies) related to advertising and how to prevent their use on the following websites:
www.youronlinechoices.com
- opens in new window or tab
www.aboutads.info/choices
- opens in new window or tab
www.networkadvertising.org/choices
- opens in new window or tab
If you decide not to allow third parties to process your personal data for advertising purposes via cookies (and similar technologies), this does not mean that we will not show you advertisements. It simply means that these advertisements will not be personalized for you using cookies or similar technologies.
10. Data security
We protect your personal data through technical and organizational security measures to minimize risks associated with data loss, misuse, unauthorized access and unauthorized disclosure and alteration. To this end we use network security services and data encryption, for example, as well as physical access restrictions for our data centers and logical access controls for data and systems access. You can find further information on our data security in our
Security Center
- opens in new window or tab
.
11. Other important information regarding data protection
This section contains important additional information about the protection of personal data in connection with the use of our Services, including whether you are required to provide personal data.
Learn more about section 11
What happens when you share your personal data on our sites or applications?
Other users have access to the information you share on eBay or disclose to other users. For example, other users can see your bids, purchases, items for sale, saved interests, sellers and searches, storefronts, feedback, ratings, product reviews and associated comments. Other users can also see any information you choose to share in your profile.
When you use our Services, your public username may be displayed and available to the public and associated with all of your public eBay activity. Notices sent to other users about suspicious activity and notice violations on our sites may refer to your public username and specific items. Accordingly, if you use a username that allows others to identify you, these others may be able to identify your eBay activities.
To help protect your personal data, we allow only limited access to other users' contact, shipping and financial information as necessary to facilitate your transactions and collect payments. However, when users are involved in a transaction, they have access to each other's name, username, (alias) email address and other contact and shipping information. For example, we may allow users to exchange telephone numbers in order to contact each other prior to completing a transaction (e.g. a seller may opt to share their telephone number with a buyer so that the buyer may call with questions about a listed item). In this case, sellers are prohibited from using a buyer's telephone number for other purposes (e.g. completing a transaction off eBay or adding the buyer to a marketing list).
Your responsibilities over transactional information you receive through eBay
When you complete a transaction with another user (or a transaction has been canceled, failed, or subsequently invalidated), we will provide you with the other user's personal data (such as name, username, (alias) email address, contact information, shipping and billing information, or return address). Independent from us, you are the controller of such data and responsible for any processing that you perform after we have shared this data with you, including compliance with any limitations imposed by this User Privacy Notice and our User Agreement.
Unless you act for purely personal purposes, we recommend that you explain your data processing activities in your own privacy notice and protect the privacy of other users. As a seller, you must in any case comply with the applicable data protection laws and in particular protect the rights of other users as data subjects, e.g. give them the opportunity to access the personal data collected by you and demand that it be erased.
You may only use the personal data that you have access to for eBay transaction-related purposes, or for other Services offered through eBay (such as shipping, fraud complaints, and member-to-member communications), and for purposes expressly consented by the user to whom the data relates. Using personal data of other users that you have access to for any other purpose, such as adding them to a mailing list without their express consent, constitutes a violation of our
User Agreement
.
Personal data relating to third parties
If you provide us with personal data relating to another person, you must obtain the consent of this person or the disclosure of the data to us must be otherwise legally permissible. You must inform the other person of how we process personal data in accordance with our User Privacy Notice.
Filtering of messages sent via our messaging tools
All messages sent via our messaging tools (including chat messages and emails sent to eBay alias email addresses) are first received by us and then forwarded to the recipient. All messages are automatically filtered according to certain criteria. If necessary, conspicuous messages are checked manually by our customer service. In the event of a violation of our
User Agreement
(including any of our
rules and policies
), we reserve the right to block the transmission of the message and to restrict the purchase and sales functions of your eBay account or to block your eBay account.
This is to protect our legitimate interests such as protecting against fraudulent or suspicious activities (e.g. spam, viruses, phishing, or other illegal activities) or enforcing our
User Agreement
and our other
rules and policies
(e.g. illegal and other prohibited content), including but not limited to enforcing the
prohibition of purchases and sales outside of eBay
.
Use of Artificial Intelligence or AI-Powered Tools
We may use artificial intelligence or AI-powered tools and products to improve our Services, to offer you new or enhanced features, a customized and personalized experience, to provide you with enhanced customer service, and to support fraud detection.
Are you obliged to provide your personal data to us?
Some of the personal data that you provide to us (e.g. data by which we can identify you) are required to enter into the User Agreement and the
Payments Terms of Use
- opens in new window or tab
and/or to comply with legal obligations. For example, under the
Payments Terms of Use
- opens in new window or tab
you must provide us with certain identification information including legal name, date of birth, and tax identification number or social security number so that we may fulfill our legal "Know Your Customer" (KYC) obligations. As described in our User Privacy Notice and in the
Payments Terms of Use
- opens in new window or tab
, we may share this data with other eBay Affiliates in order to facilitate transactions and with service providers, including payment processors, credit agencies and bureaus. Although the provision of any other personal data (e.g. address and shipping data) is voluntary, it may be necessary for the use of our Services, such as bidding, purchase and sales data to complete a transaction.
Children's Privacy
Our services are not intended for the use by children. We do not knowingly collect personal data from users who are considered children under applicable national laws. Under our User Agreement, children are not permitted to use our Services.
Staying Signed in
When you sign into your account on our Services, we give you the option to stay signed into your account for a certain amount of time. If you are using a public or shared computer, we encourage you to decline. You or any other user of the computer/browser you signed in on will be able to view and access most parts of your account and take certain specific actions during this signed in period without any further authorization. The specific actions and account activities that you or any other user of this computer/browser may take include:
Bid, buy or make an offer on an item
Check out or add items to your cart
Purchase an item with PayPal using Faster Checkout (if enabled in your account)
View the activity header
View the My eBay page
View or edit the Watchlist or order details
View the profile page
Send member-to-member messages
Conduct after-sale activities, like leaving feedback, canceling orders, requesting returns or submitting claims
If you attempt to change your password or username, update any other account information or attempt other account activity beyond those listed above, you may be required to enter your password.
You can typically end your signed in session by either signing out and/or clearing your cookies. If you have certain browser privacy settings enabled, simply closing your browser may also end your signed in session. If you are using a public or shared computer, you should sign out and/or clear your cookies when you are done using our Services to protect your account and your personal data.
12. Regional and State Privacy Disclosures
For additional regional disclosures for residents of certain U.S. states, including California, please review our
State Privacy Disclosures
- opens in new window or tab
page. For U.S. sellers (including those in California, Nevada, North Dakota, and Vermont), please follow the link to eBay Commerce Inc.'s
U.S. Consumer Privacy Notice
- opens in new window or tab
. For additional disclosures for specific regions or countries, including Brazil, mainland of People's Republic of China, and the United Kingdom, please review our
Regional Privacy Disclosures
- opens in new window or tab
page.
Previous User Privacy Notice
Previous User Privacy Notice (effective March 24, 2023 to April 7, 2024)
1. Scope and updates of this User Privacy Notice
This User Privacy Notice applies to your use of this website and all eBay applications, services (including payment services), products and tools (collectively the "Services") provided by eBay Inc. or its affiliates (eBay Inc. and the companies it directly or indirectly controls are referred to as "eBay Affiliates"). This User Privacy Notice applies regardless of how you access or use these Services, including access via mobile devices and apps. For additional regional and state disclosures, please see section
12. Regional and State Privacy Disclosures
below.
Learn more about section 1
This User Privacy Notice also applies if reference is made to it via a link or in a similar manner, e.g. on websites of partners on which Services from eBay are offered.
We may change this User Privacy Notice at any time by posting the revised User Privacy Notice on this website and indicating the effective date of the revised User Privacy Notice. You will be notified of any material changes to this User Privacy Notice via My Messages in My eBay and/or by email.
2. Controller
Which eBay Affiliate is responsible for the collection and processing of your personal data in connection with the provision of the Services depends on how you use our Services.
2.1 Use of the Services (except payment services for sellers)
Depending on the region in which you reside, one of the following eBay Affiliates is responsible for the collection and processing of your personal data in connection with the provision of our Services (except payment services for sellers):
USA
: eBay Inc., 2025 Hamilton Avenue, San Jose, CA 95125, USA
Canada
: eBay Canada Limited, 240 Richmond Street West, 2nd Floor Suite 02-100 Toronto, Ontario, M5V 1V6, Canada
EU
: eBay GmbH, Albert-Einstein-Ring 2-6, 14532 Kleinmachnow, Germany
United Kingdom
: eBay (UK) Limited, 1 More London Place, London, SE1 2AF, United Kingdom
India
: eBay Singapore Services Private Limited, 1 Raffles Quay, #18- 00, Singapore 048583
For all other countries
: eBay Marketplaces GmbH, Helvetiastrasse 15/17, 3005 Bern, Switzerland
2.2 Use of the payment services for sellers
Depending on the region in which you reside or where your payments are processed, the following eBay Affiliates are responsible for the collection and processing of your personal data in connection with the provision of our payment services to sellers:
USA
: eBay Commerce Inc., 2065 Hamilton Ave., San Jose, CA 95125, USA
EEA/CH
: eBay S.à r.l., 22-24 Boulevard Royal, L-2449 Luxembourg
UK:
eBay Commerce UK Ltd., 1 More London Place, London SE1 2AF, United Kingdom
Canada:
eBay Commerce Canada Limited, 44 Chipman Hill, Suite 1000, Saint John NB E2L 2A9, Canada
Australia:
eBay Commerce Australia Pty. Ltd., Level 18, 1 York Street, Sydney NSW 2000, Australia
Singapore:
eBay Commerce Singapore Private Limited, 1 Raffles Quay, #18-00, Singapore 048583, Singapore
For all other countries:
eBay Commerce Inc., 2065 Hamilton Ave., San Jose, CA 95125, USA
As described in our
Payments Terms of Use
- opens in new window or tab
, your personal data may be processed by one or more of these entities depending on your location and the eBay website on which a user completes a transaction with you.
3. Data protection officer and contact
We have appointed data protection officers in several countries to oversee the protection of your personal data. You will find the contact details of your data protection officer in the
list of our data protection officers
- opens in new window or tab
in our
eBay Privacy Center
- opens in new window or tab
.
Furthermore, if you have any questions or complaints regarding this User Privacy Notice, our global data protection principles (see section
6.1 Data transfers to eBay Affiliates
under section
6. International data transfers
below) or our handling of personal data, you can contact the eBay Privacy Team or the controller who is responsible for the processing of your personal data at any time (for further information, see section
2. Controller
above). This applies regardless of whether we have appointed a data protection officer in your country. You can find all necessary information and
contact details
- opens in new window or tab
in our
eBay Privacy Center
- opens in new window or tab
.
4. What personal data we collect and process
We collect your personal data when you use our Services, create a new eBay account, provide us with information via a web form, add or update information in your eBay account, participate in online community discussions or otherwise interact with us. We also collect personal data from other sources (such as eBay Affiliates, credit agencies or bureaus, and data providers).
Learn more about section 4
In total, we collect the following personal data:
4.1 Personal data you provide when using our Services or creating an eBay account
Data that identifies you, such as your name, address, telephone numbers, email addresses, username or tax identification number that you provide when setting up your eBay account or at a later date.
If you use our Services as a seller, additional identification data, such as, government-issued ID (e.g. social security number), date of birth, tax identification numbers (such as VAT identification number), identification documents and information contained on IDs, selfie photos, and other information (such as bank account number) that you provide when using our payment and other services as a seller.
Data regarding bids, purchases, or sales that you provide in a transaction.
Content that you share with other users through our messaging tools (see
Filtering of messages sent via our messaging tools
under section
11. Other important information regarding data protection
for more information).
Financial information (e.g. credit card and account numbers, transaction details, and form of payment).
Shipping, billing, and other information you provide, as well as information required for customs clearance (such as tax identification numbers or other identification numbers) and relevant shipping information (such as shipment numbers and tracking information) if shipped through one of our programs.
In some cases: age, gender, country of birth, nationality, country of residence, employment status, family status, interests and preferences.
When you submit a report to eBay: Data that identifies you, such as your name and email address, and additional information that you provide with your report.
You may provide us with additional information through a web form or by updating or adding information to your eBay account, by participating in community discussions, member chats, surveys, inquiries, dispute resolution, customer service calls recorded with your consent, or if you contact us for any other reason regarding our Services.
Other data that we are required or entitled by applicable law to collect and process and that we need for your authentication or identification, or for the verification of the data we collect.
4.2 Personal data we collect automatically when you use our Services or create an eBay account
Data that is generated as part of one of your transactions (e.g. as relating to bids, purchases, sales, fees) or that is linked to your eBay account as a result of a transaction in which you are involved, such as transaction amounts, time and location of transactions and form of payment or payout method.
Data that is generated through your other actions when you use our Services and which is linked to your eBay account (e.g. eBay account numbers, your currency preference, when you place items in your shopping cart, place items on the watch list, save sellers, searches or interests, follow users, or seek to use the services of third-party partners for payments or otherwise).
Data regarding all other interactions with our Services, your advertising preferences, and your communications with us.
Location data, including your general location data (e.g. IP address) and, with your permission, the precise location data of your mobile device. Please note that for most mobile devices, you can manage or disable the use of precise location services for all applications in the settings menu of your mobile device.
Certain metadata recording the settings of your camera included in images of items you upload for sale.
Computer and connection information, such as statistics regarding your use of our Services, information on data traffic to and from websites, referral URL, information on advertisements, your IP address, your access times including accessed pages within our Services, your language settings and your weblog information.
4.3 Personal data we collect in connection with the use of cookies and similar technologies
We use cookies and similar technologies to collect data in connection with our Services. We collect this data from the devices (including mobile devices) that you use our Services with. The data collected includes the following usage- and device-related information:
Data about the pages you visit, the access time, frequency and duration of visits, the links on which you click and other actions you take as part of your use of our Services and in advertising and email content.
Data about your activities and interactions with our advertising partners including data about the advertisements you were shown, how often they were shown, when and where they were shown, and whether you took any action, such as clicking on an advertisement or making a purchase.
The user segment or category into which you as a user fall, for example: female, 20-49 years old, interested in sneakers.
Model or device type, operating system and version, browser type and settings, device ID or individual device identifier, advertisement ID, individual device token, and cookie-related data (e.g. cookie ID).
The IP address from which your device accesses our Services.
Location data, including your general location data (e.g. IP address) and, with your permission, the precise location data of your mobile device. Please note that most mobile devices allow you to manage or disable the use of precise location services for all applications in the settings menu.
For more information about our use of these technologies and your choices, see section
9. Cookies & similar technologies
.
4.4 Personal data from other sources
We also collect personal data about you from other sources and from third parties to the extent permitted by applicable law. In particular, this includes the following data:
Data from public sources (e.g. public sanctions lists).
Data from credit agencies or bureaus (e.g. credit reports/checks, identity confirmation, data for risk modeling and setting of credit limits).
Data from data providers (e.g. "Know Your Customer"/identity verification, demographic, interest-based and online advertising related data).
With regard to our payment services for sellers: data from government or other sources concerning any previous convictions of the respective seller, to the extent permitted by applicable law.
We combine or connect the personal data we collect from you with data from these other sources. Where personal data is disclosed to us by third parties, we take steps to ensure that these third parties are legally permitted to disclose your personal data to us. We also receive access to personal data about you from eBay Affiliates.
4.5 Social network data you share with us
We allow you to use providers of single sign-on services (such as Google, Facebook, or Apple) with whom you already have an account to create an eBay account or to link your eBay account to such single sign-on services. You can determine the personal data that we can access when authorizing the connection with the single sign-on service.
We allow you to share personal data with social networks (such as Facebook) or to link your eBay account to a social network. These social networks may automatically provide us with access to certain personal data they have stored about you (e.g. content you have viewed or enjoyed, information about the advertisements you have been shown or clicked on, etc.). You can determine the personal data that we can access through the privacy settings of each social network.
We may also use plug-ins or other technologies from various social networks. If you click on a link displayed through a social network plug-in, you voluntarily connect to that social network.
5. Purposes and legal basis for data processing and categories of recipients
We process your personal data for various purposes and based on several different legal bases that allow this processing. For example, we process your personal data to provide and improve our Services, to provide you with a personalized user experience on this website, to contact you about your eBay account and our Services, to provide customer service, to provide you with personalized advertising and marketing communications, and to detect, prevent, mitigate and investigate fraudulent or illegal activity. We also share your information with third parties, including service providers acting on our behalf, for these purposes. In addition, we may share your personal data among eBay Affiliates in order to fulfill our contract with you under the User Agreement and, if applicable, the
Payments Terms of Use
- opens in new window or tab
.
Learn more about section 5
Below you will find a summary of the purposes for which we process your personal data, including the categories of recipients to whom we transmit personal data for the purposes stated, sorted by our legal basis for this processing or sharing:
5.1 We process your personal data in order to fulfill our contract with you and to provide you with our Services. This includes the following purposes:
Processing of data relating to you or your company for the purpose of entering into a contract with you and executing it.
Provision of our Services, including but not limited to enabling and performing transactions with other users (including the transmission of your personal data to other users where necessary to perform the transaction, including in cases of terminated, failed or subsequently voided transactions, e.g. by sharing your return address so a buyer may return an item), displaying your transaction and feedback history to you, providing and enhancing features such as payment processing, ratings, authentication services and eBay account management, providing other services you may use (as described in connection with such services), and ensuring the functionality of our Services. In connection with the provision of our Services, we will send you notifications relating to the execution of transactions and the use of our Services in accordance with the communication preferences in your eBay account.
Enabling the delivery of purchased items by logistics/shipping service providers including notifications in connection with the delivery (such as tracking information), the latter to the extent permitted by applicable law without your consent.
Provision of our payment services in accordance with the
Payments Terms of Use
- opens in new window or tab
.
Providing general customer support including the solution of problems with your eBay account, arbitration of disputes, providing other services within the scope of customer service as well as enforcement of fee claims. For these purposes, we may contact you via notification in My eBay, email, telephone, SMS, push notification on your mobile device or by mail. If we contact you by telephone, in order to ensure efficiency, we may use automatically dialed calls with tape announcements or automated text messages in accordance with our User Agreement and
Payments Terms of Use
- opens in new window or tab
, to the extent permitted by applicable law.
Processing of general location data (such as IP address or postal code) in order to provide you with location-based services (such as radius search and other content that is personalized on the basis of your general location data).
Enforcement of our User Agreement,
Payments Terms of Use
- opens in new window or tab
, this User Privacy Notice and other rules and policies.
Publication and promotion of your listings and related content on the websites or in the applications, services and tools of eBay Affiliates or cooperating third-party operators of websites, applications, services and tools. When we share the content of your listings and any related personal data with third parties, we do so only on the basis of an agreement that limits the use of such personal data by the third party to the purposes necessary to fulfill its contractual obligations to us. Third-party providers are contractually obliged to take appropriate security measures with regard to this data. Third-party providers are strictly forbidden to pass on personal data contained in your listings to other third parties. In case of data transmissions to eBay Affiliates, such restrictions result from our Binding Corporate Rules (see section
6.1 Data transfers to eBay Affiliates
under section
6. International data transfers
below).
Where necessary, we transmit your personal data to processors and the following recipients for one or several of the purposes described above:
Other eBay users
eBay Affiliates
External service providers, authentication partners, physical storage service partners, and shipping companies (such as DHL, UPS, etc.)
Government agencies or public authorities (including customs and tax authorities)
Payment service providers
External operators of websites, applications, services and tools
5.2 We process your personal data in order to comply with legal obligations to which we are subject. This includes the following purposes:
Participation in investigations and proceedings (including judicial proceedings) conducted by public authorities or government agencies, in particular, for the purpose of detecting, investigating and prosecuting illegal acts.
Prevention, detection and mitigation (including compliance with reporting requirements) of illegal activities (e.g. fraud, money laundering, terrorist financing, child abuse and violations of sanctions legislation).
Complying with information requests from third parties based on any statutory information rights they have against us (e.g. in the event of an intellectual property infringement, product piracy, or other unlawful activity).
Complying with information collection, verification, disclosure and reporting requirements under consumer protection, anti-fraud, online platform and tax legislation.
Complying with data access requirements under payment services legislation (e.g. under the EU Payment Services Directive) as a provider of payment services).
Ensuring the security of our Services.
Retention and storage of your personal data to comply with specific legal retention requirements (for more information on eBay's storage of your data, see section
7. Storage duration and erasure
).
Where necessary, we transmit your personal data to processors and the following recipients for one or several of the purposes described above:
Law enforcement agencies, courts, government agencies or public authorities (including tax and financial authorities), intergovernmental or supranational bodies (in connection with our payment services provided in the EU for sellers in particular with regard to compliance with Luxembourg laws concerning FATCA dated July 7, 2015 and concerning the OECD Common Reporting Standard dated December 18, 2015).
Third parties based on statutory information claims against us, including participants in the
eBay VeRO program
- opens in new window or tab
and the PROACT program.
Third-party service providers.
Other third-party service providers you select to access your data under payment services legislation and as authorized in each case by you.
Third parties who are involved in judicial proceedings, in particular, if they submit a legal order, court order or equivalent legal order to us.
Credit agencies, bureaus, or associations, if required by applicable law (e.g. information on payment delays, payment defaults or other irregularities that may be relevant to your credit report).
eBay Affiliates.
5.3 We process your personal data in order to protect your vital interests or the vital interests of another natural person. This includes the following purposes:
Prevention, detection, mitigation and investigation of unlawful activities that may result in impairment of your vital interests or the vital interests of another natural person, unless there is a statutory obligation to this effect.
Where necessary, we transmit your personal data to processors and the following recipients for one or several of the purposes described above:
Law enforcement agencies, courts, government agencies or public authorities, intergovernmental or supranational bodies
Third parties who are involved in judicial proceedings
eBay Affiliates
External service providers
5.4 We process your personal data where necessary for the purposes of the legitimate interests pursued by us or by a third party, except where such interests are overridden by your interests or fundamental rights and freedoms. In order to reconcile our legitimate interests with your rights, we have introduced appropriate control mechanisms. On this basis, we process your data for the following purposes:
Participation in investigations and proceedings (including judicial proceedings) conducted by courts, law enforcement agencies, government agencies or public authorities, intergovernmental or supranational bodies, in particular for the purpose of detecting, investigating and prosecuting illegal acts, unless there is a statutory obligation to this effect, and we may legitimately assume that the disclosure of the data is necessary to avert imminent disadvantages or to report a suspicion of an illegal act. In such cases, we will only disclose what we believe is necessary, and to the extent permitted by applicable laws, such as your name, city, zip code, telephone number, email address, (previous) usernames, IP address, fraud complaints, bidding and listing history.
Protection of the legitimate interests of third parties (including participants of the
VeRO program
- opens in new window or tab
and the PROACT program) in connection with civil law disputes, including the investigation of such disputes, unless there is a statutory obligation to this effect, if we may legitimately assume that it is necessary to disclose the data to such third parties in order to avert imminent disadvantages. In such cases, we will only disclose what we believe is necessary, and to the extent permitted by applicable laws, such as the seller's name, address, city, zip code, country, telephone number, email address and company name to the third party and bind the third party by a worldwide non-disclosure agreement to treat the data as confidential.
Prevention, detection, mitigation and investigation of fraud, financial crimes and harms, violation of international sanctions legislation, security incidents and other prohibited or unlawful activities, including the assessment of corresponding risks (e.g. through the use of captchas, a port enumeration technology to identify user sessions using remote desktop tools, metadata or the telephone number stored in your eBay account for risk assessments and two-factor authentication) and the implementation of corresponding measures (e.g. disabling certain forms of payment based upon the risk associated with the underlying transaction), unless there is a statutory obligation to this effect.
Verifying that reports submitted to eBay (incl. unnamed reports) are not fraudulent or malicious.
Monitoring and improvement of the security of our Services, unless there is a statutory obligation to this effect.
Performance of identity checks, creditworthiness and other financial standing checks, evaluation of applications and comparison of information for accuracy and verification purposes.
Automatic filtering and, where necessary, manual review of messages sent through our messaging tools (including chat messages and emails sent to eBay alias email addresses) to prevent fraudulent or suspicious activity or violations of our
User Agreement
or other
rules and policies
, including enforcing the
prohibition of purchases and sales outside of eBay
, as further explained below under
Filtering of messages sent via our messaging tools
(see section
11. Other important information regarding data protection
).
Provision of functions for users that make the processing of transactions easier or more convenient (e.g. administration of several delivery addresses).
Analysis and improvement of the Services from eBay Affiliates, e.g. by reviewing site usage data or information from users about blocked or crashed pages in order to identify and solve problems and to provide you with an improved user experience, including as part of product development.
Analysis of telephone conversations with our customer service that we recorded with your consent.
Advertisements by mail (according to your communication preferences in your eBay account).
To the extent permitted by applicable law without your consent, communications with you via electronic mail (e.g. email or text message) or telephone to offer you vouchers, discounts and special offers, to conduct opinion polls and surveys, and to inform you about our Services (according to your communication preferences in your eBay account). If you no longer wish to receive marketing emails from us, you can also unsubscribe by clicking on the link in the footer of the email you received. For technical reasons, the implementation may take a few days.
For users outside the European Economic Area (EEA), Switzerland and the United Kingdom: Advertising and content personalization, measurement and analytics, on and off our sites, as explained in our
Advertising and related preferences page
- opens in new window or tab
.
Customization of page content to display the items and services you may like based on the actions you take.
Evaluation of the quality and success of our email marketing campaigns (e.g. through analysis of opening and click rates).
Assessment of the service status (e.g. on the basis of tracking information if sellers use shipping labels from shipping providers via eBay or provide tracking numbers).
Offering or facilitating the offering of partner and bonus programs and other co-branded marketing efforts (e.g. product warranties, seller financing offers or co-branded credit cards in collaboration with a third-party lender, partner, or credit card issuer), to the extent permitted by applicable law.
Provision of shared content and services (such as registration for services, transaction processing and customer service) with eBay Affiliates or cooperating payment service providers.
Initiation, preparation and execution of a company acquisition, e.g. in the event of a merger with another company or takeover by another company. If such an event occurs, we will require the merged entity to comply with this User Privacy Notice with respect to your personal data. Should your personal data be processed for any purpose not specified in this User Privacy Notice, you will be informed in advance of the processing of your data for this new purpose.
Assertion of or defense against legal claims, including those asserted by one eBay user against another eBay user.
Enabling eBay Affiliates to comply with legal obligations they are subject to, including information collection, verification, disclosure and reporting requirements under consumer protection, anti-fraud, online platform and tax legislation.
To comply with an impending legal obligation.
For users in the United States: investigating and communicating the outcome of disputes with the affected users (e.g. sharing information about eBay's investigation of a complaint of a user's violation of a policy with the reporting user).
Where necessary, we transmit your personal data to processors and the following recipients for one or several of the purposes described above:
eBay Affiliates
External service providers
Other eBay users
Law enforcement agencies, courts, government agencies or public authorities, intergovernmental or supranational bodies
Third parties who are involved in judicial proceedings
Participants in the
eBay VeRO program
- opens in new window or tab
, PROACT program, and other third parties in the event of an investigation for fraud, intellectual property infringement, retail crime, stolen goods, product piracy or other unlawful activity
Payment service providers
Third-party partners in furtherance of offering commercial financing opportunities
Credit agencies or bureaus, data verification services, risk assessment vendors and collections agencies (e.g. information about payment delays, payment defaults, or other irregularities that may be relevant to your credit report, or that we use to confirm your identity, model risk, establish credit limits, or collect unpaid debts)
Other companies in the context of a company acquisition
Information about your right to object to processing based on our legitimate interests can be found below under
Rights as a data subject
and, with regard to the use of cookies and similar technologies, below under
Cookies & similar technologies
.
5.5 With your consent, we process your personal data for the following purposes:
For users within the European Economic Area (EEA), Switzerland and the United Kingdom: Advertising and content personalization, measurement and analytics, on and off our sites, as explained on our
Advertising and related preferences page
- opens in new window or tab
.
Communications with you via electronic mail (such as email or text message) or telephone, including communications by eBay Affiliates or by third parties, to offer you vouchers, discounts and special offers, unless these communications are permitted without your consent under applicable law. We may engage third parties to send marketing communications on our behalf.
Processing of your precise location data to provide location-based services. Please note that most mobile devices allow you to manage or disable the use of precise location services for all applications in the settings menu.
For users within the European Economic Area (EEA): Storing your financial information (e.g. credit card and account numbers) for future transactions.
Provision of a single sign-on service allowing you to register or log into third-party services using your eBay log-in credentials.
For sellers, processing of your biometric data to identify you and further prevent fraud and reduce other risks on our platform, and in connection with Know Your Customer and similar compliance requirements.
Processing of your personal data on the basis of your consent, which you have given so that we or third parties can enable you to use certain services or make them available to you.
You can find information about your right to withdraw your consent below under section
8. Rights as a data subject
and information with regard to the use of cookies and similar technologies below under section
9. Cookies & similar technologies
.
Where necessary, we transmit your personal data to processors and the following recipients for one or several of the purposes described above:
eBay Affiliates
External service providers
Third parties using our single sign-on service (as authorized by you in each single case)
Other third parties with whom we partner to offer you specific services (as described at the collection of the respective user consent)
Third-party advertising partners such as Google, Meta, Microsoft, Pinterest, and TikTok, as listed on our
Advertising and related preferences page
- opens in new window or tab
5.6 Data Sharing between eBay Affiliates
As set out above under "Personal data from other sources", we also receive access to personal data about you from eBay Affiliates. This enables us, in particular, to provide you, with your consent as legally required, with information about products and services, which we believe might interest you, and improve our products, services, content, and advertising by analyzing your use of the services of eBay Affiliates, in particular through the matching of certain data (e.g. cookie IDs). Furthermore, this allows us to better prevent, detect, mitigate and investigate fraud, security incidents and other prohibited or unlawful activities, including the assessment of corresponding risks. We will also grant access to personal data about you to eBay Affiliates for the aforementioned purposes. To the extent that eBay Affiliates have access to your personal data, they will follow practices that are at least as restrictive as the practices described in this User Privacy Notice.
5.7 Additional information regarding our payment services for sellers
With regard to our payment services for sellers in the EEA and Switzerland, we additionally point out that eBay S.à r.l. is subject to professional secrecy, which requires special transparency with regard to the processing and, in particular, the transmission of your personal data. We therefore expressly draw your attention to the fact that eBay S.à r.l. may pass on your personal data to trustworthy third parties and business partners where necessary to provide our payment services for sellers, as described above in this Section 5 of the User Privacy Notice. This includes in particular the following third parties and business partners:
Other payment service providers, including financial institutions
Companies offering financial products, analyses and scoring (e.g. credit agencies or bureaus)
Authorities, agencies and other governmental bodies (e.g. to combat fraud)
Auditors and other professional advisors
5.8 Automated decision-making
We use technologies that are considered automated decision making or profiling. We will not make any automated decisions about you that would significantly affect you unless such a decision is necessary for entering into, or the performance of, a contract with you, we have obtained your consent, or we are required by applicable law to use such technology. You will find information on your right to object to this processing of your data below under section
8. Rights as a data subject
.
6. International data transfers
Some recipients of your personal data are located outside your country or have offices in countries where data protection laws may provide a different level of protection than the laws in your country. When transferring personal data to such recipients, we provide appropriate safeguards.
Learn more about section 6
6.1 Data transfers to eBay Affiliates
The transmission of personal data between eBay Affiliates (e.g. to enable cross border transactions and for other legally permitted purposes) is based on our worldwide data protection principles, which are binding internal data protection regulations (Binding Corporate Rules, BCRs), or on the basis of other appropriate safeguards (e.g. standard data protection clauses issued or approved by the European Commission (2021/914/EU). Through our Binding Corporate Rules, eBay Affiliates undertake to protect your personal data and to comply with data protection obligations. Further information on our binding company-wide guidelines and our worldwide data protection principles can be found in the
eBay Privacy Center
- opens in new window or tab
.
6.2 Other data transfers (from the European Economic Area to third countries)
We may transfer your personal data to recipients (see section 5. Purposes and legal basis for data processing and categories of recipients) who may be located anywhere in the world. We will only transfer your personal data from the European Economic Area (EEA), United Kingdom or Switzerland to third countries, i.e. countries outside the EEA, on the basis of appropriate safeguards or if otherwise authorized by applicable law. Third countries providing an adequate level of data protection according to the European Commission currently include Andorra, Argentina, Canada (for companies covered by the Personal Information Protection and Electronic Documents Act), Switzerland (for transfers out of the EEA), the Faroe Islands, Guernsey, the State of Israel, the Isle of Man, Japan, Jersey, New Zealand, South Korea, the United Kingdom and Uruguay. In other cases, eBay provides the necessary safeguards, e.g. through the conclusion of data protection contracts adopted by the European Commission (e.g. standard data protection clauses (2021/914/EU) with the recipients, or through other measures provided for by law. Additional information regarding the measures taken by us is available
on request
. We regularly re-evaluate the measures taken to assess requirements deriving from new regulatory guidance and case law, e.g. from the Court of Justice of the European Union (CJEU) decision in the matter C-311/18.
7. Storage duration and erasure
Your personal data will be stored by us and our service providers in accordance with applicable data protection laws to the extent necessary for the processing purposes set out in this User Privacy Notice (see section
5. Purposes and legal basis for data processing and categories of recipients
for more information on the processing purposes). Subsequently, we will delete your personal data in accordance with our data retention and deletion policy or take steps to properly render the data anonymous, unless we are legally obliged or permitted to keep your personal data longer (e.g. for legal compliance, tax, accounting or auditing purposes, or to detect and prevent fraudulent or illegal activity on eBay). In Europe, the retention periods are generally between 6 and 10 years (e.g. for contracts, notifications and business letters). As far as legally permissible or required, we restrict the processing of your data instead of deleting it (e.g. by restricting access to it). This applies in particular to cases where we may still need the data for the execution of the contract or for the assertion of or defense against legal claims, or where such retention is otherwise required or permitted by law. In these cases, the duration of the restriction of processing depends on the respective statutory limitation or retention periods. The data will be deleted after the relevant limitation or retention periods have expired.
Learn more about section 7
The specific retention periods for personal data are documented in our regional data retention guidelines. How long we retain personal data may vary depending on the Services we provide and our legal obligations under applicable national law. The following factors typically affect the retention period:
Necessity for the provision of our Services
This includes such things as executing the User Agreement with you, maintaining and improving the performance of our products, keeping our systems secure, and maintaining appropriate business and financial records. Most of our retention periods are determined on the basis of this general rule.
Consent-based processing of personal data
If we process personal data on the basis of consent (including consent to the extended storage), we store the data for as long as necessary in order to process it according to your consent.
Statutory, contractual or other similar obligations
Corresponding storage obligations may arise, for example, from laws or official orders. It may also be necessary to store personal data with regard to pending or future legal disputes. Personal data contained in contracts, notifications and business letters may be subject to statutory storage obligations depending on national law.
8. Rights as a data subject
Subject to possible restrictions under national law, as a data subject, you have the right to access, rectification, erasure, restriction of processing and data portability with regard to your personal data. In addition, you can withdraw your consent and
object
to our processing of your personal data on the basis of our legitimate interests. You can also lodge a complaint with a supervisory authority.
Learn more about section 8
Your rights in detail:
Where we rely on consent you can
withdraw your consent
to the processing of your personal data by us at any time. As a result, we may no longer process your personal data based on this consent in the future. The withdrawal of consent has no effect on the lawfulness of processing based on consent before its withdrawal.
You have the right to obtain
access
to your personal data that is being processed by us. In particular, you may request information on the purposes of the processing, the categories of personal data concerned, the categories of recipients to whom the personal data have been or will be disclosed, where possible the envisaged period for which the personal data will be stored or the criteria used to determine that period, the existence of the right to request rectification or erasure of personal data or restriction of processing of personal data or to object to such processing, the right to lodge a complaint with a supervisory authority, any available information as to the personal data's source (where they are not collected from you), the existence of automated decision-making, including profiling and, where appropriate, meaningful information on its details. Your right to access shall not adversely affect the rights and freedoms of others. Your right to access may be limited by national law.
You have the right to obtain from us without undue delay the
rectification
of inaccurate personal data concerning you. Taking into account the purposes of the processing, you have the right to have incomplete personal data completed, including by means of providing a supplementary statement.
You have the right to obtain from us the
erasure
of personal data concerning you under certain conditions (e.g. when the personal data are no longer necessary in relation to the purposes for which they were processed or when they are no longer required for overriding legitimate grounds, such as the detection/prevention of fraud), unless processing is necessary for exercising the right of freedom of expression and information, for compliance with a legal obligation, for reasons of public interest or for the establishment, exercise or defense of legal claims. The right to erasure may be limited by national law.
You have the right to obtain from us
restriction of processing your personal data
to the extent that
the accuracy of the data is disputed by you,
the processing is unlawful, but you oppose the erasure of the personal data,
we no longer need the data, but you need it to assert, exercise or defend legal claims or
you have objected to the processing.
You have the right to receive the personal data concerning you, which you have provided to us, in a structured, commonly used and machine-readable format and have the right to transmit those data to another controller ("
right to data portability
").
You have the right to lodge a complaint with a
supervisory authority
. As a rule, you can contact the supervisory authority of your usual place of residence, your place of work or the registered office of the
controller
.
If your personal data is processed on the basis of our legitimate interests, you have the
right to object
to the processing of your personal data on grounds relating to your particular situation. This also applies to profiling. If your personal data is processed by us for direct marketing purposes, you have the right to object at any time to the processing of your personal data for such marketing, which includes profiling to the extent that it is related to such direct marketing.
Exercising your rights and managing your settings
You can exercise your rights as a data subject via our
Privacy Contact page
- opens in new window or tab
. In addition, you are of course free to contact the eBay Privacy Team or the controller who is responsible for the processing of your personal data at any time (for further information, see section
2. Controller
above). You can find all necessary information and
contact details
- opens in new window or tab
in our
eBay Privacy Center
- opens in new window or tab
.
The exercise of the above data subjects' rights (e.g. right to access or erasure) is generally free of charge. Where requests are manifestly unfounded or excessive, in particular because of their repetitive character, we may charge an appropriate fee (at most our actual costs), in accordance with the applicable statutory regulations, or refuse to process the application.
Managing your communication preferences
If you would like to change your preferences regarding eBay communications (including marketing communications), you can do so at any time through your account in My eBay under "Communication Preferences". If you no longer wish to receive email marketing communications from us, you can also unsubscribe by clicking on the link in the footer of the email you received. For technical reasons, the implementation may take a few days. For information on how to manage your cookies and similar technologies preferences, see the next section
9. Cookies & similar technologies
.
9. Cookies & similar technologies
When you use our Services, we and authorized third parties make use of cookies and similar technologies (which we will refer to collectively as "cookies") to provide you with a better, faster and safer user experience or to show you personalized advertising. You can find detailed information about the use of cookies and similar technologies and your choices in our
User Cookie Notice
.
Learn more about section 9
The cookies and similar technologies used in connection with the Services have different functions:
They may be technically necessary for the provision of our Services
They help us optimize our Services technically (e.g. monitoring of error messages and loading times)
They help us improve your user experience (e.g. save font size and form data entered)
They allow us to show you more relevant advertisements
We use cookies and similar technologies that remain on your device only as long as your browser is active (session cookies), as well as cookies and similar technologies that remain on your device longer (persistent cookies). We take appropriate security measures to prevent unauthorized access to our cookies and similar technologies.
Your choices regarding cookies and similar technologies
Please see our
User Cookie Notice
for more information and your choices with respect to cookies and similar technologies, or go directly to
Advertising and related preferences
- opens in new window or tab
(users in the EEA, Switzerland and the United Kingdom) or
AdChoice - eBay Advertising Preferences
- opens in new window or tab
(all users) to manage your preferences.
You are also free to disable the use of cookies and similar technologies if this is supported by your device. You can manage your cookie settings in your browser or device settings.
You can find information about third-party cookies (and similar technologies) related to advertising and how to prevent their use on the following websites:
www.youronlinechoices.com
- opens in new window or tab
www.aboutads.info/choices
- opens in new window or tab
(only available in English)
www.networkadvertising.org/choices
- opens in new window or tab
(only available in English)
If you decide not to allow third parties to process your personal data for advertising purposes via cookies (and similar technologies), this does not mean that we will not show you advertisements. It simply means that these advertisements will not be personalized for you using cookies or similar technologies.
10. Data security
We protect your personal data through technical and organizational security measures to minimize risks associated with data loss, misuse, unauthorized access and unauthorized disclosure and alteration. To this end we use network security services and data encryption, for example, as well as physical access restrictions for our data centers and logical access controls for data and systems access. You can find further information on our data security in our
Security Center
- opens in new window or tab
.
11. Other important information regarding data protection
This section contains important additional information about the protection of personal data in connection with the use of our Services, including whether you are required to provide personal data.
Learn more about section 11
What happens when you share your personal data on our sites or applications?
Other users have access to the information you share on eBay or disclose to other users. For example, other users can see your bids, purchases, items for sale, saved interests, sellers and searches, storefronts, feedback, ratings, product reviews and associated comments. Other users can also see any information you choose to share in your profile.
When you use our Services, your public user ID may be displayed and available to the public and associated with all of your public eBay activity. Notices sent to other users about suspicious activity and notice violations on our sites may refer to your public user ID and specific items. Accordingly, if you use a username that allows others to identify you, these others may be able to identify your eBay activities.
To help protect your personal data, we allow only limited access to other users' contact, shipping and financial information as necessary to facilitate your transactions and collect payments. However, when users are involved in a transaction, they have access to each other's name, user ID, (alias) email address and other contact and shipping information. For example, we may allow users to exchange telephone numbers in order to contact each other prior to completing a transaction (e.g. a seller may opt to share their telephone number with a buyer so that the buyer may call with questions about a listed item). In this case, sellers are prohibited from using a buyer's telephone number for other purposes (e.g. completing a transaction off eBay or adding the buyer to a marketing list).
Your responsibilities over transactional information you receive through eBay
When you complete a transaction with another user (or a transaction has been canceled, failed, or subsequently invalidated), we will provide you with the other user's personal data (such as name, username, (alias) email address, contact information, shipping and billing information, or return address). Independent from us, you are the controller of such data and responsible for any processing that you perform after we have shared this data with you, including compliance with any limitations imposed by this User Privacy Notice and our User Agreement.
Unless you act for purely personal purposes, we recommend that you explain your data processing activities in your own privacy notice and protect the privacy of other users. As a seller, you must in any case comply with the applicable data protection laws and in particular protect the rights of other users as data subjects, e.g. give them the opportunity to access the personal data collected by you and demand that it be erased.
You may only use the personal data that you have access to for eBay transaction-related purposes, or for other Services offered through eBay (such as shipping, fraud complaints, and member-to-member communications), and for purposes expressly consented by the user to whom the data relates. Using personal data of other users that you have access to for any other purpose, such as adding them to a mailing list without their express consent, constitutes a violation of our
User Agreement
.
Personal data relating to third parties
If you provide us with personal data relating to another person, you must obtain the consent of this person or the disclosure of the data to us must be otherwise legally permissible. You must inform the other person of how we process personal data in accordance with our User Privacy Notice.
Filtering of messages sent via our messaging tools
All messages sent via our messaging tools (including chat messages and emails sent to eBay alias email addresses) are first received by us and then forwarded to the recipient. All messages are automatically filtered according to certain criteria. If necessary, conspicuous messages are checked manually by our customer service. In the event of a violation of our
User Agreement
(including any of our
rules and policies
), we reserve the right to block the transmission of the message and to restrict the purchase and sales functions of your eBay account or to block your eBay account.
This is to protect our legitimate interests such as protecting against fraudulent or suspicious activities (e.g. spam, viruses, phishing, or other illegal activities) or enforcing our
User Agreement
and our other
rules and policies
(e.g. illegal and other prohibited content), including but not limited to enforcing the
prohibition of purchases and sales outside of eBay
.
Are you obliged to provide your personal data to us?
Some of the personal data that you provide to us (e.g. data by which we can identify you) are required to enter into the User Agreement and the
Payments Terms of Use
- opens in new window or tab
. For example, under the
Payments Terms of Use
- opens in new window or tab
you must provide us with certain identification information including legal name, date of birth, and tax identification number or social security number so that we may fulfill our legal "Know Your Customer" (KYC) obligations. As described in our User Privacy Notice and in the
Payments Terms of Use
- opens in new window or tab
, we may share this data with other eBay Affiliates in order to facilitate transactions and with service providers, including payment processors, credit agencies and bureaus. Although the provision of any other personal data (e.g. address and shipping data) is voluntary, it may be necessary for the use of our Services, such as bidding, purchase and sales data to complete a transaction.
Children's Privacy
Our services are not intended for the use by children. We do not knowingly collect personal data from users who are considered children under applicable national laws. Under our User Agreement, children are not permitted to use our Services.
Staying Signed in
When you sign into your account on our Services, we give you the option to stay signed into your account for a certain amount of time. If you are using a public or shared computer, we encourage you to decline. You or any other user of the computer/browser you signed in on will be able to view and access most parts of your account and take certain specific actions during this signed in period without any further authorization. The specific actions and account activities that you or any other user of this computer/browser may take include:
Bid, buy or make an offer on an item
Check out or add items to your cart
Purchase an item with PayPal using Faster Checkout (if enabled in your account)
View the activity header
View the My eBay page
View or edit the Watch List or order details
View the profile page
Send member-to-member messages
Conduct after-sale activities, like leaving feedback, canceling orders, requesting returns or submitting claims
If you attempt to change your password or user ID, update any other account information or attempt other account activity beyond those listed above, you may be required to enter your password.
You can typically end your signed in session by either signing out and/or clearing your cookies. If you have certain browser privacy settings enabled, simply closing your browser may also end your signed in session. If you are using a public or shared computer, you should sign out and/or clear your cookies when you are done using our Services to protect your account and your personal data.
12. Regional and State Privacy Disclosures
For additional regional disclosures for residents of certain U.S. states, including California, please review our
State Privacy Disclosures
- opens in new window or tab
page. For U.S. sellers (including those in California, Nevada, North Dakota, and Vermont), please follow the link to eBay Commerce Inc.'s
U.S. Consumer Privacy Notice
- opens in new window or tab
. For additional disclosures for specific regions or countries, including Brazil and mainland of People's Republic of China, please review our
Regional Privacy Disclosures
- opens in new window or tab
page.
Was this article helpful for you?
You might also be interested in:
Unsolicited idea submissions policy
At eBay, we appreciate comments from our members on our products and services. But we have a long-standing policy of not accepting unsolicited suggestions, ideas, or proposals.
3 min article
Threats and offensive language policy
Threats, offensive language and hate speech are not allowed on eBay.
2 min article
eBay's intellectual property policy
Our name and logo are registered trademarks so their use is restricted and protected by intellectual property law.
4 min article
Sub-policy 8
https://www.facebook.com/about/privacy/update:
Facebook
Email or phone
Password
Forgot account?
Create new account
It looks like you were misusing this feature by going too fast. You’ve been temporarily blocked from using it.
Back
English (US)
Gaeilge
Polski
Lietuvių
Português (Brasil)
Русский
Română
Español
Français (France)
Deutsch
Italiano
Meta © 2025
Allow the use of cookies from Facebook on this browser?
We use cookies and similar technologies to help provide and improve content on
Meta Products
. We also use them to provide a safer experience by using information we receive from cookies on and off Facebook, and to provide and improve Meta Products for people who have an account.
Essential cookies: These cookies are required to use Meta Products and are necessary for our sites to work as intended.
Cookies from other companies: We use these cookies to show you ads off of Meta Products and to provide features like maps and videos on Meta Products. These cookies are optional.
You have control over the optional cookies we use. Learn more about cookies and how we use them, and review or change your choices at any time in our
Cookies Policy
.
About cookies
What are cookies?
Learn more
Why do we use cookies?
Learn more
What are Meta Products?
Learn more
Your cookie choices
Learn more
Cookies from other companies
We use cookies from
other companies
in order to show you ads off of our Products, and provide features like maps, payment services and video.
Choose cookies by category
How we use these cookies
If you allow these cookies
If you don't allow these cookies
Other ways you can control your information
Manage your ad experience in Accounts Center
More information about online advertising
Controlling cookies with browser settings
Allow all cookies
Decline optional cookies
Allow all cookies
Decline optional cookies
Sub-policy 9
https://www.interpublic.com/privacy-notice:
Privacy Notice
Effective date September 16, 2019
Applicability of this Privacy Notice
Information We Obtain
Automated Collection of Data
Third Party Web Analytics Services
How We Use Personal Information
Personal Information Sharing
Cross-Border Transfer
Your Rights and Choices
Other Online Services and Third-Party Features
Retention of Personal Information
How We Protect Personal Information
Children’s Personal Information
Updates to Our Privacy Notice
How to Contact Us
The Interpublic Group of Companies, Inc. (“IPG”) respects your concerns about privacy. This Website Privacy Notice describes the types of information we collect about individuals on
https://www.interpublic.com
(the “Site”), how we use the information, with whom we share it, and the choices available regarding our use of the information. The Website Privacy Notice also describes the measures we take to safeguard the personal information, how long we retain it and how individuals can contact us about our privacy practices and to exercise their rights.
Applicability of this Privacy Notice
This Website Privacy Notice applies only to the information we collect on this Site and not to any information we collect through other methods or services, including websites owned or operated by our affiliates, vendors or partners.
Information We Obtain
Information You Provide
We may collect and store personal information (such as name and other contact details) that you choose to provide to us through the Site or when you contact us. “Personal Information” is information that identifies you as an individual or relates to an identifiable individual. The types of personal information we collect may include:
Contact information, such as your name, email address and telephone number; and
Other personal information you may submit to us, such as when you contact us.
Automated Collection of Data
When you use the Site, we may obtain certain information by automated means, such as browser cookies, beacons, device identifiers, server logs and other technologies. The information we obtain in this manner may include your device IP address, domain name, identifiers associated with your devices, device and operating system type and characteristics, web browser characteristics, language preferences, clickstream data, your interactions with the Site (such as the web pages you visit, links you click and features you use), the pages that led or referred you to the Site, dates and times of access to the Site and other information about your use of the Site.
A “cookie” is a text file that websites send to a visitor’s computer or other Internet-connected device to uniquely identify the visitor’s browser or to store information or settings in the browser. Cookie technology holds information a site may need to personalize a visitor’s experience. Cookies may also be used for security purposes.
You may adjust your cookie settings at any time by clicking
here
. You can stop certain types of cookies from being downloaded on your computer by selecting the appropriate settings on your web browser. Most web browsers will tell you how to stop accepting new browser cookies, how to be notified when you receive a new browser cookie and how to disable existing cookies. You can find out how to do this for your particular browser by clicking “help” on your browser’s menu or by visiting
www.allaboutcookies.org
. The Site is not designed to respond to “do not track” signals received from browsers. Please note that without cookies or other automated tools you may not be able to use all of the features of the Site.
These technologies help us (1) track and understand how you use and interact with the Site; (2) measure the usability of the Site; (3) understand the effectiveness of our communications; and (4) otherwise manage and enhance the functionality of the Site. We may use the information collected through these technologies for any purpose, except where we are required to do otherwise under applicable law. If we are required to treat such information as Personal Information under applicable law, then we may use and disclose such information for the purposes for which we use and disclose Personal Information, as detailed in this Website Privacy Notice.
Third Party Web Analytics Services
We use third-party online analytics services, such as Google Analytics. The service providers that administer these analytics services use cookies and similar technologies to collect and analyze information about use of the Site and report on activities and trends and diagnose technical issues. To learn more about Google’s practices, please visit
https://policies.google.com/technologies/partner-sites
, and opt out of them by downloading the Google Analytics opt-out browser add-on, available at
https://tools.google.com/dlpage/gaoptout
.
How We Use Personal Information
We use the Personal Information we obtain on the Site for legitimate business purposes, to further our relationship with you and for other purposes, including to:
Provide our services to you; process, evaluate and respond to your requests and inquiries; and send newsletters, industry updates or administrative information to you, such as changes to our terms, conditions and policies. We will engage in these activities to manage our contractual relationship with you and/or to comply with a legal obligation.
Operate, evaluate and improve our business (including developing new services; enhancing and improving our services; analyzing our services; managing our communications; performing data analytics and market research; learning about our visitors, analyzing our services and website; facilitating the functionality of our website and performing accounting, auditing and other internal functions). We will engage in these activities to comply with a legal obligation and/or because we have a legitimate interest.
Verify your identity to ensure security for the other purposes listed here and protect against, identify and prevent fraud, security breaches and other criminal activity and risks. We will engage in these activities to comply with a legal obligation and/or because we have a legitimate interest.
Comply with and enforce applicable legal requirements, relevant industry standards and our policies, including this Website Privacy Notice and/or Agency’s Terms and Conditions or Terms of Use. We will engage in these activities to comply with a legal obligation and/or because we have a legitimate interest.
Aggregate and/or anonymize Personal Information so that it will no longer be considered personal information. We do so to generate other data for our use, which we may use and disclose for any purpose.
Personal Information Sharing
We share your Personal Information with:
Our IPG-related entities for the purposes described in this Website Privacy Notice. You can consult the list and location of such entities
here
.
Our service providers who perform services on our behalf, such as hosting this Site or data analytics. We do not authorize our service providers to use or disclose the information except as necessary to perform services on our behalf or comply with legal requirements.
We also may disclose information about you (1) if we are required to do so by law or legal process (such as a court order or subpoena), including laws outside your country of residence; (2) in response to requests by, or to cooperate with, government agencies, such as law-enforcement authorities, including outside of your country of residence; (3) to establish, exercise or defend our legal rights; (4) when we believe disclosure is necessary or appropriate to protect our rights, privacy, safety or property and/or that of our affiliates, you or others; (5) in connection with an investigation of suspected or actual illegal activity; (6) in connection with the sale or transfer of all or a portion of our business, assets or stock (including in the event of a reorganization, dissolution or liquidation); or (7) otherwise with your consent.
Cross-Border Transfer
Your personal information may be processed and stored in any country where we have facilities or in which we engage service providers, and, by using the Site, you understand that your information may be transferred to countries outside of your country of residence, including the United States, which may have data protection rules that are different from those of your country. In certain circumstances, courts, law-enforcement agencies, regulatory agencies or security authorities in those other countries may be entitled to access your personal information.
ADDITIONAL INFORMATION REGARDING THE EUROPEAN ECONOMIC AREA (“EEA”): Some non-EEA countries are recognized by the European Commission as providing an adequate level of data protection, according to EEA standards (the full list of these countries is available
here
). For transfers from the EEA to countries not considered adequate by the European Commission, we have put in place adequate measures, such as standard contractual clauses adopted by the European Commission to protect your personal information. You may obtain a copy of these measures
here
.
Your Rights and Choices
We offer you certain choices in connection with the personal information we obtain about you. If you would like to request to review, correct, update, suppress, restrict or delete personal information, to object to the processing of personal information or to receive an electronic copy of your personal information for purposes of transmitting it to another company (to the extent these rights are provided to you by applicable law), please contact us as specified in the
How to Contact Us
section of this Website Privacy Notice. We will respond to your request consistent with applicable law.
To help protect your privacy and maintain security, we may take steps to verify your identity before granting you access to your information. To the extent permitted by applicable law, a charge may apply before we provide you with a copy of any of your personal information that we maintain.
You can unsubscribe from our marketing mailing lists by following the “Unsubscribe” link in our marketing emails. If you would like to unsubscribe from any other type of marketing you receive from us, please contact us as specified in the
How to Contact Us
section of this Website Privacy Notice.
Other Online Services and Third-Party Features
The Site may provide links to other online services and websites for your convenience and information and may include such third party features as apps, tools, widgets and plug-ins (
e.g.
, Office 365, LinkedIn, Instagram, Facebook and Twitter buttons). These services and websites may operate independently from us. The privacy practices of these third parties, including details on the information they may collect about you, are subject to their own privacy statements. To the extent any linked online services or third-party features are not owned or controlled by us, IPG is not responsible for these third parties’ information or other practices.
Retention of Personal Information
We retain personal information for as long as needed or permitted in light of the purposes for which we obtained it and consistent with applicable law. The criteria used to determine our retention periods include:
The length of time we have an ongoing relationship with you and provide the Site or our services to you;
Whether there is a legal obligation to which we are subject; and
Whether retention is advisable in light of our legal position (such as in regard to applicable statutes of limitation, litigation or regulatory investigations).
How We Protect Personal Information
We seek to use reasonable administrative, technical and physical safeguards designed to protect personal information within our organization. Unfortunately, no information transmission or storage system can be guaranteed to be 100 percent secure. If you have reason to believe that your interaction with us is no longer secure, please immediately notify us in accordance with the
How to Contact Us
section of this Website Privacy Notice.
Children’s Personal Information
The Site is designed for a general audience and is not directed to children under the age of 16. Agency does not knowingly collect or solicit personal information from children under the age of 16 through the Site. If you believe that a child under the age of 16 may have provided us with personal information through the Site, please contact us as specified in the
How to Contact Us
section of this Website Privacy Notice.
Updates to Our Privacy Notice
This Website Privacy Notice may be updated periodically and without prior notice to you to reflect changes in our personal information practices. We will indicate at the top of the notice when it was most recently updated. Any changes will become effective when we post the revised Website Privacy Notice on the Site.
How to Contact Us
IPG, located at 909 Third Avenue, New York, NY 10022, is the company responsible for collection, use and disclosure of your personal information under this Website Privacy Notice.
To contact us in relation to this Website Privacy Notice or any privacy matter, including our use of your personal information or to exercise other applicable privacy rights, please use the following contact details:
ATTN:
Assistant General Counsel, Privacy
privacy@interpublic.com
Additional Information Regarding the EEA
Our GDPR Data Protection Officer (“DPO”) may be contacted via post or email using the following details:
GDPR DPO
Interpublic Group Limited
135 Bishopsgate
London EC2M 3TP
GDPR.DPO@interpublic.com
You have the right to lodge a complaint with a data protection authority for your country or region or where an alleged infringement of applicable data protection law occurs. A list of data protection authorities is available
here
.
This website uses cookies and similar technologies to understand how you use our website and to create a better experience for you. To learn more about the technologies used and your choices, please read our
Privacy Notice
. You may adjust your cookie settings at any time through our
cookie preferences tool
.
Do you agree to the use of cookies for the purposes described above?
Accept
Reject
Privacy Overview
Strictly Necessary Cookies
Analytics and Customization
Additional Cookies
Privacy Overview
Our website uses cookies for various purposes, including to enhance the site’s functionality, and help us understand how you use and interact with the website.  To learn more about the cookies used and your choices, please see the
Online Privacy Notice
.  Please indicate below whether you agree to the use of cookies for the purposes described above.
You may adjust your cookie settings at any time by navigating the tabs on the left hand side.
Strictly Necessary Cookies
If you disable this cookie, we will not be able to save your preferences. This means that every time you visit this website you will need to enable or disable cookies again.
Strictly Necessary Cookies should be enabled at all times so that we can save your preferences for cookie settings.
Cookies that may be in use after you enable:
moove_gdpr_popup
These Cookies are used to save your Cookie Setting Preferences. 1 Year N/A
Analytics and Customization
Please enable Strictly Necessary Cookies first so that we can save your preferences!
These cookies allow us to count visits and traffic sources, so we can measure and improve the performance of our site. They help us know which pages are the most and least popular and see how visitors move around the site. All information these cookies collect is aggregated and therefore anonymous. If you do not allow these cookies, we will not know when you have visited our site.
Cookies that may be in use after you enable:
_ga
Google Analytics cookie used to distinguish users. 2years
http://optout.aboutads.info/
_gat
Google Analytics cookie used to throttle request rate. 10 minutes
http://optout.aboutads.info/
_gid
Google Analytics cookie used to distinguish users. 24Hours
http://optout.aboutads.info/
Additional Cookies
Please enable Strictly Necessary Cookies first so that we can save your preferences!
This website uses the following additional cookies:
Cookies that may be in use after you enable:
Vimeo
This cookie is used for playback on Vimeo's embeddable video player. 1 day
https://vimeo.com/cookie_policy